1 | break (noun): a short rest from work or study | loc: Pause
  EN TS: His "short" break is too long.
  de TS: Seine „kurze“ Pause ist viel zu lang.
  EN FS: His "short" run is too long.
  de FS: Sein „kurzer“ Lauf ist viel zu lang.
  EN TP: a short phone break
  de TP: eine kurze Handypause
  EN FP: a short coffee break
  de FP: eine kurze Kaffeepause
2 | certificate (noun): official proof that you finished a course | loc: Zertifikat
  EN TS: She has so many certificates!
  de TS: Sie hat so viele Zertifikate!
  EN FS: She has so many medals!
  de FS: Sie hat so viele Medaillen!
  EN TP: showing her certificates
  de TP: ihre Zertifikate zeigen
  EN FP: printing her certificates
  de FP: ihre Zertifikate ausdrucken
3 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: Klasse
  EN TS: Her class is crazy!
  de TS: Ihre Klasse ist völlig durchgedreht!
  EN FS: Her class is sleeping!
  de FS: Ihre Klasse schläft!
  EN TP: a class out of control
  de TP: eine Klasse außer Kontrolle
  EN FP: a class trip abroad
  de FP: eine Klassenfahrt ins Ausland
4 | course (noun): a series of lessons on one subject | loc: Kurs
  EN TS: She has an online course.
  de TS: Sie macht einen Onlinekurs.
  EN FS: She has an online meeting.
  de FS: Sie hat ein Online-Meeting.
  EN TP: an online course at home
  de TP: ein Onlinekurs zu Hause
  EN FP: a cooking course at school
  de FP: ein Kochkurs in der Schule
6 | cushion (noun): a soft pillow-like pad you sit or lean on | loc: Kissen
  EN TS: One cushion is not enough.
  de TS: Ein Kissen reicht nicht.
  EN FS: One chair is not enough.
  de FS: Ein Stuhl reicht nicht.
  EN TP: a pile of cushions
  de TP: ein Berg Kissen
  EN FP: a pile of blankets
  de FP: ein Berg Decken
7 | graduation (noun): the ceremony where you receive your diploma | loc: Abschlussfeier
  EN TS: It is his graduation day.
  de TS: Heute ist seine Abschlussfeier.
  EN FS: It is her graduation day.
  de FS: Heute ist ihre Abschlussfeier.
  EN TP: a graduation ceremony
  de TP: eine Abschlussfeier
  EN FP: a graduation present
  de FP: ein Geschenk zum Abschluss
8 | keycard (noun): a plastic card that unlocks an electronic lock | loc: Schlüsselkarte
  EN TS: She blamed the keycard. Wrong door.
  de TS: Sie gab der Schlüsselkarte die Schuld. Falsche Tür.
  EN FS: She blamed the suitcase. Wrong door.
  de FS: Sie gab dem Koffer die Schuld. Falsche Tür.
  EN TP: tapping the keycard
  de TP: die Schlüsselkarte ranhalten
  EN FP: losing the keycard
  de FP: die Schlüsselkarte verlieren
9 | laboratory (noun): a room with equipment for doing experiments | loc: Labor
  EN TS: This is a busy laboratory.
  de TS: In diesem Labor ist viel los.
  EN FS: This is a busy kitchen.
  de FS: In dieser Küche ist viel los.
  EN TP: working in a laboratory
  de TP: im Labor arbeiten
  EN FP: cleaning a laboratory
  de FP: ein Labor putzen
10 | leaf (noun): one of the flat green parts growing on a tree | loc: Blatt
  EN TS: A leaf is a free umbrella!
  de TS: Ein Blatt ist ein Gratis-Regenschirm!
  EN FS: A leaf is a free blanket!
  de FS: Ein Blatt ist eine Gratis-Decke!
  EN TP: a giant green leaf
  de TP: ein riesiges grünes Blatt
  EN FP: a giant green frog
  de FP: ein riesiger grüner Frosch
11 | library (noun): a place full of books you can read or borrow | loc: Bibliothek
  EN TS: This library is huge!
  de TS: Diese Bibliothek ist riesig!
  EN FS: This library is tiny!
  de FS: Diese Bibliothek ist winzig!
  EN TP: a huge old library
  de TP: eine riesige alte Bibliothek
  EN FP: a small school library
  de FP: eine kleine Schulbibliothek
13 | napkin (noun): a piece of cloth or paper to wipe your mouth | loc: Serviette
  EN TS: Her napkin is a work of art!
  de TS: Ihre Serviette ist ein Kunstwerk!
  EN FS: Her cake is a work of art!
  de FS: Ihr Kuchen ist ein Kunstwerk!
  EN TP: folding a napkin
  de TP: eine Serviette falten
  EN FP: a napkin on the floor
  de FP: eine Serviette auf dem Boden
14 | page (noun): one side of a sheet of paper in a book | loc: Seite
  EN TS: A flower is going on the page.
  de TS: Eine Blume kommt auf die Seite.
  EN FS: A photo is going on the page.
  de FS: Ein Foto kommt auf die Seite.
  EN TP: a page with flowers
  de TP: eine Seite mit Blumen
  EN FP: a page in a newspaper
  de FP: eine Seite in einer Zeitung
15 | pill (noun): a small round medicine that you swallow | loc: Tablette
  EN TS: One pill and he is fine.
  de TS: Eine Tablette und ihm geht's gut.
  EN FS: One coffee and he is fine.
  de FS: Ein Kaffee und ihm geht's gut.
  EN TP: swallowing a white pill
  de TP: eine weiße Tablette schlucken
  EN FP: a pill for sleeping
  de FP: eine Tablette zum Einschlafen
16 | presentation (noun): a talk where you show your work to a group | loc: Präsentation
  EN TS: She is giving a presentation.
  de TS: Sie hält eine Präsentation.
  EN FS: She is giving a concert.
  de FS: Sie gibt ein Konzert.
  EN TP: giving a presentation
  de TP: eine Präsentation halten
  EN FP: watching a presentation
  de FP: eine Präsentation anschauen
17 | project (noun): a planned piece of work that takes time | loc: Projekt
  EN TS: The project: one wooden shed.
  de TS: Das Projekt: ein Holzschuppen.
  EN FS: The project: one wooden boat.
  de FS: Das Projekt: ein Holzboot.
  EN TP: a big shed project
  de TP: ein großes Schuppen-Projekt
  EN FP: a school project on paper
  de FP: ein Schulprojekt auf Papier
18 | root (noun): the part of a plant that grows under the ground | loc: Wurzel
  EN TS: She is washing the roots.
  de TS: Sie wäscht die Wurzeln.
  EN FS: She is cutting the roots.
  de FS: Sie schneidet die Wurzeln.
  EN TP: rinsing the roots
  de TP: die Wurzeln abspülen
  EN FP: roots of a big tree
  de FP: Wurzeln eines großen Baums
19 | ruler (noun): a flat stick for measuring and drawing lines | loc: Lineal
  EN TS: He found a ruler at last!
  de TS: Er hat endlich ein Lineal gefunden!
  EN FS: He found a pencil at last!
  de FS: Er hat endlich einen Bleistift gefunden!
  EN TP: drawing with a ruler
  de TP: mit einem Lineal zeichnen
  EN FP: drawing with a compass
  de FP: mit einem Zirkel zeichnen
20 | schedule (noun): a plan of the things you must do and when | loc: Zeitplan
  EN TS: Full schedule, but sleep wins!
  de TS: Voller Zeitplan, aber Schlaf gewinnt!
  EN FS: Full schedule, but work wins!
  de FS: Voller Zeitplan, aber Arbeit gewinnt!
  EN TP: a full schedule
  de TP: ein voller Zeitplan
  EN FP: a bus schedule
  de FP: ein Busfahrplan
21 | school (noun): a place where children go to learn | loc: Schule
  EN TS: Welcome to my school, bro.
  de TS: Willkommen an meiner Schule, Bro.
  EN FS: Welcome to my office, bro.
  de FS: Willkommen in meinem Büro, Bro.
  EN TP: a tour of my school
  de TP: eine Tour durch meine Schule
  EN FP: a tour of my office
  de FP: eine Tour durch mein Büro
22 | scientist (noun): a person who studies nature and does experiments | loc: Wissenschaftler
  EN TS: The scientist loves charts.
  de TS: Der Wissenschaftler liebt Diagramme.
  EN FS: The student loves charts.
  de FS: Der Student liebt Diagramme.
  EN TP: a scientist with a clipboard
  de TP: ein Wissenschaftler mit Klemmbrett
  EN FP: a scientist with a microscope
  de FP: ein Wissenschaftler mit Mikroskop
23 | speech (noun): a formal talk given to an audience | loc: Rede
  EN TS: She is giving a formal speech.
  de TS: Sie hält eine förmliche Rede.
  EN FS: She is giving a short concert.
  de FS: Sie gibt ein kurzes Konzert.
  EN TP: a heartfelt speech
  de TP: eine bewegende Rede
  EN FP: a speech bubble
  de FP: eine Sprechblase
24 | spoon (noun): a tool with a small bowl for eating liquid food | loc: Löffel
  EN TS: Her spoon emptied the whole bowl!
  de TS: Ihr Löffel hat die ganze Schüssel geleert!
  EN FS: Her fork emptied the whole bowl!
  de FS: Ihre Gabel hat die ganze Schüssel geleert!
  EN TP: a spoon full of soup
  de TP: ein Löffel voll Suppe
  EN FP: a spoon full of sugar
  de FP: ein Löffel voll Zucker
25 | stapler (noun): a tool that joins papers with small metal clips | loc: Tacker
  EN TS: His stapler never gives up!
  de TS: Sein Tacker gibt niemals auf!
  EN FS: His printer never gives up!
  de FS: Sein Drucker gibt niemals auf!
  EN TP: a red stapler
  de TP: ein roter Tacker
  EN FP: a broken stapler
  de FP: ein kaputter Tacker
26 | straw (noun): a thin tube you drink through | loc: Strohhalm
  EN TS: His straw works super fast!
  de TS: Sein Strohhalm ist mega schnell!
  EN FS: His spoon works super fast!
  de FS: Sein Löffel ist mega schnell!
  EN TP: a striped bendy straw
  de TP: ein gestreifter Knickstrohhalm
  EN FP: a straw sun hat
  de FP: ein Strohhut für die Sonne
27 | student (noun): a person who learns at a school or college | loc: Student
  EN TS: This student ices her coffee.
  de TS: Diese Studentin kühlt ihren Kaffee mit Eis.
  EN FS: This student heats her coffee.
  de FS: Diese Studentin erhitzt ihren Kaffee.
  EN TP: a student with cold coffee
  de TP: eine Studentin mit kaltem Kaffee
  EN FP: a student with hot soup
  de FP: eine Studentin mit heißer Suppe
28 | subject (noun): a thing you learn at school, like maths | loc: Fach | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: School offers many subjects.
  de TS: Die Schule bietet viele Fächer.
  EN FS: School offers two subjects.
  de FS: Die Schule bietet zwei Fächer.
  EN TP: many school subjects
  de TP: viele Schulfächer
  EN FP: the subject of an email
  de FP: der Betreff einer E-Mail
29 | telescope (noun): a tube with lenses for seeing far things | loc: Teleskop
  EN TS: Her telescope shows a meteor!
  de TS: Ihr Teleskop zeigt einen Meteor!
  EN FS: Her telescope shows a rocket!
  de FS: Ihr Teleskop zeigt eine Rakete!
  EN TP: a telescope on a tripod
  de TP: ein Teleskop auf einem Stativ
  EN FP: a telescope on a ship
  de FP: ein Teleskop auf einem Schiff
30 | textbook (noun): a book used for learning a school subject | loc: Lehrbuch
  EN TS: This textbook never ends.
  de TS: Dieses Lehrbuch hört nie auf.
  EN FS: This movie never ends.
  de FS: Dieser Film hört nie auf.
  EN TP: a very thick textbook
  de TP: ein sehr dickes Lehrbuch
  EN FP: a very thin textbook
  de FP: ein sehr dünnes Lehrbuch
31 | university (noun): a place to study for a degree after school | loc: Universität
  EN TS: Week five: the university is empty.
  de TS: Woche fünf: Die Universität ist leer.
  EN FS: Week five: the university is full.
  de FS: Woche fünf: Die Universität ist voll.
  EN TP: an empty university hall
  de TP: ein leerer Hörsaal der Universität
  EN FP: an empty university library
  de FP: eine leere Universitätsbibliothek
32 | word (noun): a group of letters that has a meaning | loc: Wort | checker: word_missing? | translator note: Wörterspiel, not Wortspiel (= pun)
  EN TS: They are playing a word game.
  de TS: Sie spielen ein Wörterspiel.
  EN FS: They are playing a card game.
  de FS: Sie spielen ein Kartenspiel.
  EN TP: a fast word game
  de TP: ein schnelles Wörterspiel
  EN FP: a fast card game
  de FP: ein schnelles Kartenspiel
33 | ache (noun): a continuous dull pain, like in a tooth | loc: Schmerz
  EN TS: Coffee makes the ache worse!
  de TS: Kaffee macht den Schmerz schlimmer!
  EN FS: Ice makes the ache worse!
  de FS: Eis macht den Schmerz schlimmer!
  EN TP: an ache in the jaw
  de TP: Schmerz im Kiefer
  EN FP: an ache in the back
  de FP: Schmerz im Rücken
34 | activity (noun): something you do for fun or exercise | loc: Aktivität
  EN TS: Badminton: a great activity.
  de TS: Badminton: eine tolle Aktivität.
  EN FS: Tennis: a great activity.
  de FS: Tennis: eine tolle Aktivität.
  EN TP: an afternoon activity outside
  de TP: eine Aktivität draußen am Nachmittag
  EN FP: an activity for rainy days
  de FP: eine Aktivität für Regentage
35 | actor (noun): a man who plays roles in films or plays | loc: Schauspieler
  EN TS: The actor deserves an Oscar!
  de TS: Der Schauspieler verdient einen Oscar!
  EN FS: The singer deserves an Oscar!
  de FS: Der Sänger verdient einen Oscar!
  EN TP: an actor on set
  de TP: ein Schauspieler am Set
  EN FP: an actor on a poster
  de FP: ein Schauspieler auf einem Plakat
36 | adore (verb): to love someone or something very much | loc: vergöttern
  EN TS: She adores this cat so much!
  de TS: Sie vergöttert diese Katze so sehr!
  EN FS: She adores this dog so much!
  de FS: Sie vergöttert diesen Hund so sehr!
  EN TP: adoring her orange cat
  de TP: ihre orange Katze vergöttern
  EN FP: adoring her orange dog
  de FP: ihren orangen Hund vergöttern
37 | advance (verb): to move forward towards a goal | loc: vorrücken | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The team is advancing to the goal.
  de TS: Das Team rückt zum Ziel vor.
  EN FS: The team is advancing to the hut.
  de FS: Das Team rückt zur Hütte vor.
  EN TP: advancing to the summit
  de TP: zum Gipfel vorrücken
  EN FP: advancing to the final
  de FP: ins Finale vorrücken
38 | airport (noun): a place where planes take off and land | loc: Flughafen
  EN TS: Heavy traffic at the airport today.
  de TS: Heute viel Verkehr am Flughafen.
  EN FS: No traffic at the airport today.
  de FS: Heute kein Verkehr am Flughafen.
  EN TP: a busy airport runway
  de TP: eine belebte Startbahn am Flughafen
  EN FP: an airport shop
  de FP: ein Laden am Flughafen
39 | ambulance (noun): a vehicle that takes sick people to hospital | loc: Krankenwagen
  EN TS: An ambulance is pulling over.
  de TS: Ein Krankenwagen fährt rechts ran.
  EN FS: A taxi is pulling over.
  de FS: Ein Taxi fährt rechts ran.
  EN TP: an ambulance on a street
  de TP: ein Krankenwagen auf der Straße
  EN FP: an ambulance on a motorway
  de FP: ein Krankenwagen auf der Autobahn
40 | answer (noun): what you say or write back to a question | loc: Antwort
  EN TS: She hates the answer.
  de TS: Sie hasst die Antwort.
  EN FS: She loves the answer.
  de FS: Sie liebt die Antwort.
  EN TP: an answer from a card
  de TP: eine Antwort auf einer Karte
  EN FP: an answer from a friend
  de FP: eine Antwort von einem Freund
41 | argument (noun): an angry talk where people disagree | loc: Streit
  EN TS: Just a small argument.
  de TS: Nur ein kleiner Streit.
  EN FS: Just a small kiss.
  de FS: Nur ein kleiner Kuss.
  EN TP: an argument about a picture
  de TP: Streit um ein Bild
  EN FP: an argument about money
  de FP: Streit ums Geld
42 | exam (noun): a test of what you know at school | loc: Prüfung
  EN TS: This exam is too hard for him.
  de TS: Diese Prüfung ist zu schwer für ihn.
  EN FS: This exam is too easy for him.
  de FS: Diese Prüfung ist zu leicht für ihn.
  EN TP: giving up on the exam
  de TP: bei der Prüfung aufgeben
  EN FP: passing the exam
  de FP: die Prüfung bestehen
44 | anger (noun): the strong feeling of being annoyed or furious | loc: Wut
  EN TS: So much anger over a bag of flowers!
  de TS: So viel Wut wegen einer Tüte Blumen!
  EN FS: So much anger over a bag of apples!
  de FS: So viel Wut wegen einer Tüte Äpfel!
  EN TP: anger at the flower market
  de TP: Wut auf dem Blumenmarkt
  EN FP: anger at a traffic jam
  de FP: Wut im Stau
45 | angry (adjective): feeling very mad and upset with someone | loc: wütend
  EN TS: She is angry at the man!
  de TS: Sie ist wütend auf den Mann!
  EN FS: She is angry at the dog!
  de FS: Sie ist wütend auf den Hund!
  EN TP: an angry woman
  de TP: eine wütende Frau
  EN FP: angry about the rain
  de FP: wütend wegen des Regens
46 | apple (noun): a round fruit with red or green skin | loc: Apfel
  EN TS: That apple looks so crispy!
  de TS: Der Apfel sieht so knackig aus!
  EN FS: That pear looks so crispy!
  de FS: Die Birne sieht so knackig aus!
  EN TP: biting a red apple
  de TP: in einen roten Apfel beißen
  EN FP: baking an apple pie
  de FP: einen Apfelkuchen backen
47 | arena (noun): a big indoor hall with seats around a court | loc: Arena
  EN TS: The arena is packed. Insane!
  de TS: Die Arena ist rappelvoll. Krass!
  EN FS: The arena is empty. Insane!
  de FS: Die Arena ist leer. Krass!
  EN TP: a packed indoor arena
  de TP: eine volle Hallenarena
  EN FP: an empty indoor arena
  de FP: eine leere Hallenarena
48 | arrive (verb): to reach a place at the end of a trip | loc: ankommen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He arrived and he is so happy!
  de TS: Er ist angekommen und so glücklich!
  EN FS: He arrived and he is so sad!
  de FS: Er ist angekommen und so traurig!
  EN TP: arriving at a beach hotel
  de TP: an einem Strandhotel ankommen
  EN FP: arriving at the office
  de FP: im Büro ankommen
49 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: Pfeil
  EN TS: Her arrow hit the bullseye.
  de TS: Ihr Pfeil hat ins Schwarze getroffen.
  EN FS: Her arrow hit the tree.
  de FS: Ihr Pfeil hat den Baum getroffen.
  EN TP: an arrow in the bullseye
  de TP: ein Pfeil mitten im Schwarzen
  EN FP: an arrow on the sign
  de FP: ein Pfeil auf dem Schild
50 | jar (noun): a small glass pot with a lid | loc: Tiegel | checker: word_missing? | translator note: Tiegel = cosmetics pot; glass jars are Gläser
  EN TS: The jars look like cake!
  de TS: Die Gläser sehen aus wie Kuchen!
  EN FS: The jars look like soup!
  de FS: Die Gläser sehen aus wie Suppe!
  EN TP: filling small glass jars
  de TP: kleine Gläser befüllen
  EN FP: opening small glass jars
  de FP: kleine Gläser öffnen
51 | squeeze (verb): to press something firmly together with your hand | loc: zusammendrücken
  EN TS: Squeezing slime is so satisfying.
  de TS: Slime zusammendrücken ist sooo befriedigend.
  EN FS: Squeezing clay is so satisfying.
  de FS: Knete zusammendrücken ist sooo befriedigend.
  EN TP: squeezing colorful slime
  de TP: bunten Slime zusammendrücken
  EN FP: squeezing a lemon
  de FP: eine Zitrone auspressen
52 | assistant (noun): a person whose job is to help someone | loc: Assistent
  EN TS: The assistant does everything.
  de TS: Der Assistent macht alles.
  EN FS: The model does everything.
  de FS: Das Model macht alles.
  EN TP: a helpful assistant
  de TP: ein hilfsbereiter Assistent
  EN FP: a shop assistant
  de FP: ein Verkäufer im Laden
53 | athletics (noun): track-and-field sports like running and jumping | loc: Leichtathletik
  EN TS: This is athletics at its best.
  de TS: Das ist Leichtathletik vom Feinsten.
  EN FS: This is swimming at its best.
  de FS: Das ist Schwimmen vom Feinsten.
  EN TP: athletics at a stadium
  de TP: Leichtathletik im Stadion
  EN FP: athletics on television
  de FP: Leichtathletik im Fernsehen
54 | atm (noun): the machine in the street that gives you cash | loc: Geldautomat
  EN TS: ATM cash for sunflowers!
  de TS: Bargeld vom Geldautomaten für Sonnenblumen!
  EN FS: ATM cash for pizza!
  de FS: Bargeld vom Geldautomaten für Pizza!
  EN TP: taking cash from an ATM
  de TP: Geld am Geldautomaten abheben
  EN FP: an ATM keeping her card
  de FP: der Geldautomat schluckt ihre Karte
55 | auction (noun): a public sale where the highest bidder wins | loc: Auktion
  EN TS: She won the auction.
  de TS: Sie hat die Auktion gewonnen.
  EN FS: She lost the auction.
  de FS: Sie hat die Auktion verloren.
  EN TP: bidding at an auction
  de TP: bei einer Auktion bieten
  EN FP: an auction on the internet
  de FP: eine Auktion im Internet
56 | autumn (noun): the season after summer when leaves fall | loc: Herbst
  EN TS: Autumn leaves everywhere!
  de TS: Herbst: überall Laub!
  EN FS: Autumn snow everywhere!
  de FS: Herbst: überall Schnee!
  EN TP: jumping into autumn leaves
  de TP: in Herbstlaub springen
  EN FP: autumn leaves on a tree
  de FP: Herbstlaub am Baum
57 | back (noun): the part of a place farthest from the front | loc: hinterer Teil
  EN TS: They love the back row!
  de TS: Sie lieben den hinteren Teil!
  EN FS: They love the front row!
  de FS: Sie lieben den vorderen Teil!
  EN TP: sitting at the back
  de TP: im hinteren Teil sitzen
  EN FP: the back of the stage
  de FP: die Rückseite der Bühne
58 | backpack (noun): a bag with two straps you wear on your shoulders | loc: Rucksack
  EN TS: Her backpack is huge, no joke.
  de TS: Ihr Rucksack ist riesig, kein Witz.
  EN FS: Her suitcase is huge, no joke.
  de FS: Ihr Koffer ist riesig, kein Witz.
  EN TP: packing an orange backpack
  de TP: einen orangen Rucksack packen
  EN FP: a backpack at school
  de FP: ein Rucksack in der Schule
61 | backward (adverb): in the direction behind you | loc: rückwärts
  EN TS: Why are they walking backward?
  de TS: Warum gehen die rückwärts?
  EN FS: Why are they running backward?
  de FS: Warum rennen die rückwärts?
  EN TP: walking backward in a park
  de TP: rückwärts durch den Park gehen
  EN FP: falling backward in a park
  de FP: rückwärts im Park hinfallen
62 | bag (noun): a soft container you carry things in | loc: Tasche
  EN TS: The apple escaped the bag!
  de TS: Der Apfel ist aus der Tasche geflohen!
  EN FS: The bread escaped the bag!
  de FS: Das Brot ist aus der Tasche geflohen!
  EN TP: packing a picnic bag
  de TP: eine Picknicktasche packen
  EN FP: a plastic shopping bag
  de FP: eine Plastiktüte vom Einkauf
65 | baking sheet (noun): the flat metal tray you bake food on in the oven | loc: Backblech
  EN TS: Veggies on a baking sheet.
  de TS: Gemüse auf dem Backblech.
  EN FS: Cookies on a baking sheet.
  de FS: Kekse auf dem Backblech.
  EN TP: veggies on a baking sheet
  de TP: Gemüse auf einem Backblech
  EN FP: cookies on a baking sheet
  de FP: Kekse auf einem Backblech
66 | baking (noun): cooking bread or cake in an oven | loc: Backen
  EN TS: They are baking bread.
  de TS: Sie backen Brot.
  EN FS: They are baking a cake.
  de FS: Sie backen einen Kuchen.
  EN TP: baking a golden loaf
  de TP: einen goldenen Laib backen
  EN FP: baking cookies
  de FP: Kekse backen
67 | banana (noun): a long curved yellow fruit you peel | loc: Banane
  EN TS: He learned a new banana trick.
  de TS: Er hat einen neuen Bananentrick gelernt.
  EN FS: He learned a new apple trick.
  de FS: Er hat einen neuen Apfeltrick gelernt.
  EN TP: peeling a banana
  de TP: eine Banane schälen
  EN FP: a banana in a smoothie
  de FP: eine Banane im Smoothie
68 | bandage (noun): a strip of soft cloth wrapped around a wound | loc: Verband
  EN TS: A bandage for her wrist.
  de TS: Ein Verband für ihr Handgelenk.
  EN FS: A bandage for her knee.
  de FS: Ein Verband für ihr Knie.
  EN TP: an elastic wrist bandage
  de TP: ein elastischer Verband am Handgelenk
  EN FP: a bandage on the head
  de FP: ein Verband am Kopf
69 | barbell (noun): the long metal bar with heavy plates on both ends | loc: Langhantel
  EN TS: The barbell lost. She won!
  de TS: Die Langhantel hat verloren. Sie hat gewonnen!
  EN FS: The barbell won. She lost!
  de FS: Die Langhantel hat gewonnen. Sie hat verloren!
  EN TP: deadlifting a heavy barbell
  de TP: Kreuzheben mit schwerer Langhantel
  EN FP: bending a heavy barbell
  de FP: eine schwere Langhantel verbiegen
70 | barber (noun): a person who cuts men's hair and beards | loc: Barbier
  EN TS: This barber is a legend!
  de TS: Dieser Barbier ist eine Legende!
  EN FS: This baker is a legend!
  de FS: Dieser Bäcker ist eine Legende!
  EN TP: a barber trimming a beard
  de TP: ein Barbier stutzt einen Bart
  EN FP: a barber sweeping the floor
  de FP: ein Barbier fegt den Boden
71 | bark (noun): the rough outer skin of a tree trunk | loc: Rinde
  EN TS: Birch bark is like paper.
  de TS: Die Rinde der Birke ist wie Papier.
  EN FS: Pine bark is like paper.
  de FS: Die Rinde der Kiefer ist wie Papier.
  EN TP: peeling birch bark
  de TP: Birkenrinde abschälen
  EN FP: a dog's loud bark
  de FP: lautes Hundebellen
72 | basketball (noun): a team game of throwing a ball through a hoop | loc: Basketball
  EN TS: Basketball queen, what a dunk!
  de TS: Basketball-Queen, was für ein Dunk!
  EN FS: Basketball queen, what a miss!
  de FS: Basketball-Queen, was für ein Fehlwurf!
  EN TP: a basketball dunk
  de TP: ein Basketball-Dunk
  EN FP: basketball on television
  de FP: Basketball im Fernsehen
74 | bat (noun): a small flying animal that hangs upside down | loc: Fledermaus
  EN TS: A bat is flying over the lake.
  de TS: Eine Fledermaus fliegt über den See.
  EN FS: A bat is flying over the city.
  de FS: Eine Fledermaus fliegt über die Stadt.
  EN TP: a bat flying at sunset
  de TP: eine Fledermaus im Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a bat hitting a ball
  de FP: ein Schläger trifft einen Ball
75 | flap (verb): to move wings up and down quickly to fly | loc: flattern
  EN TS: Dude, the bats are flapping.
  de TS: Alter, die Fledermäuse flattern.
  EN FS: Dude, the birds are flapping.
  de FS: Alter, die Vögel flattern.
  EN TP: flapping big wings
  de TP: mit großen Flügeln flattern
  EN FP: flapping on the cave floor
  de FP: auf dem Höhlenboden flattern
76 | battery (noun): a small object that stores power for devices | loc: Batterie
  EN TS: Blame the old batteries.
  de TS: Schuld sind die alten Batterien.
  EN FS: Blame the old bulb.
  de FS: Schuld ist die alte Glühbirne.
  EN TP: loading new batteries
  de TP: neue Batterien einlegen
  EN FP: a battery for a car
  de FP: eine Batterie fürs Auto
78 | beach (noun): an area of sand or stones next to the sea | loc: Strand
  EN TS: The sea took their castle on the beach.
  de TS: Das Meer hat ihre Sandburg am Strand geholt.
  EN FS: A dog took their castle on the beach.
  de FS: Ein Hund hat ihre Sandburg am Strand geholt.
  EN TP: a sandcastle on the beach
  de TP: eine Sandburg am Strand
  EN FP: a beach full of stones
  de FP: ein Strand voller Steine
79 | bear (noun): a large heavy wild animal with thick fur | loc: Bär
  EN TS: The bear is chasing a fish!
  de TS: Der Bär jagt einen Fisch!
  EN FS: The bear is chasing a duck!
  de FS: Der Bär jagt eine Ente!
  EN TP: a bear in a river
  de TP: ein Bär im Fluss
  EN FP: a bear in a zoo
  de FP: ein Bär im Zoo
80 | beard (noun): hair that grows on a man's chin and cheeks | loc: Bart
  EN TS: Ten years to grow that beard!
  de TS: Zehn Jahre für diesen Bart!
  EN FS: Ten days to grow that beard!
  de FS: Zehn Tage für diesen Bart!
  EN TP: a long black beard
  de TP: ein langer schwarzer Bart
  EN FP: a short grey beard
  de FP: ein kurzer grauer Bart
81 | beauty (noun): the quality of being very pleasing to look at | loc: Schönheit
  EN TS: Pure beauty in Santorini.
  de TS: Pure Schönheit auf Santorini.
  EN FS: Pure beauty in Venice.
  de FS: Pure Schönheit in Venedig.
  EN TP: the beauty of the sunset
  de TP: die Schönheit des Sonnenuntergangs
  EN FP: a beauty salon in town
  de FP: ein Schönheitssalon in der Stadt
82 | bee (noun): a flying insect that makes honey and can sting | loc: Biene
  EN TS: The bee is going back to work.
  de TS: Die Biene geht zurück an die Arbeit.
  EN FS: The ant is going back to work.
  de FS: Die Ameise geht zurück an die Arbeit.
  EN TP: a bee on a flower
  de TP: eine Biene auf einer Blume
  EN FP: a bee in a jar
  de FP: eine Biene in einem Glas
83 | beer (noun): an alcoholic drink made from grain | loc: Bier
  EN TS: The beer foam is top quality.
  de TS: Der Schaum auf dem Bier: Premiumqualität.
  EN FS: The milk foam is top quality.
  de FS: Der Schaum auf der Milch: Premiumqualität.
  EN TP: pouring a golden beer
  de TP: ein goldenes Bier einschenken
  EN FP: beer at a football match
  de FP: Bier beim Fußballspiel
84 | belt (noun): a strap you wear around your waist | loc: Gürtel
  EN TS: The belt saved his trousers!
  de TS: Der Gürtel hat seine Hose gerettet!
  EN FS: The rope saved his trousers!
  de FS: Das Seil hat seine Hose gerettet!
  EN TP: putting on a leather belt
  de TP: einen Ledergürtel anlegen
  EN FP: taking off a leather belt
  de FP: einen Ledergürtel abnehmen
85 | betray (verb): to break someone's trust after promising help | loc: verraten
  EN TS: The kid betrayed him!
  de TS: Das Kind hat ihn verraten!
  EN FS: The dog betrayed him!
  de FS: Der Hund hat ihn verraten!
  EN TP: a betrayed farmer
  de TP: ein verratener Bauer
  EN FP: a betrayed kid
  de FP: ein verratenes Kind
86 | bill (noun): the paper that says what you pay in a restaurant | loc: Rechnung
  EN TS: That bill is way too long!
  de TS: Die Rechnung ist viel zu lang!
  EN FS: That bill is way too short!
  de FS: Die Rechnung ist viel zu kurz!
  EN TP: a very long bill
  de TP: eine sehr lange Rechnung
  EN FP: a bill in a wallet
  de FP: eine Rechnung im Portemonnaie
87 | bird (noun): an animal with feathers and wings | loc: Vogel
  EN TS: The bird is giving a concert!
  de TS: Der Vogel gibt ein Konzert!
  EN FS: The cat is giving a concert!
  de FS: Die Katze gibt ein Konzert!
  EN TP: a bird singing loudly
  de TP: ein laut singender Vogel
  EN FP: a bird in a cage
  de FP: ein Vogel im Käfig
88 | dog (noun): an animal kept as a pet that barks | loc: Hund
  EN TS: The dog wants a selfie.
  de TS: Der Hund will ein Selfie.
  EN FS: The cat wants a selfie.
  de FS: Die Katze will ein Selfie.
  EN TP: a dog near the camera
  de TP: ein Hund nah an der Kamera
  EN FP: a dog near the door
  de FP: ein Hund nah an der Tür
89 | cat (noun): a small furry pet that says meow | loc: Katze
  EN TS: The black cat is jumping off.
  de TS: Die schwarze Katze springt runter.
  EN FS: The tabby cat is jumping off.
  de FS: Die getigerte Katze springt runter.
  EN TP: a cat on a tower
  de TP: eine Katze auf einem Kratzbaum
  EN FP: a cat under a tower
  de FP: eine Katze unter einem Kratzbaum
90 | puppy (noun): a young dog | loc: Welpe
  EN TS: Wait, puppies can dance?!
  de TS: Moment, Welpen können tanzen?!
  EN FS: Wait, puppies can fly?!
  de FS: Moment, Welpen können fliegen?!
  EN TP: a puppy in the bath
  de TP: ein Welpe in der Badewanne
  EN FP: a puppy in the snow
  de FP: ein Welpe im Schnee
91 | blame (verb): to say someone is responsible for something bad | loc: beschuldigen
  EN TS: Mum is blaming the boy. The cat did it.
  de TS: Mama beschuldigt den Jungen. Die Katze war's.
  EN FS: Mum is blaming the boy. The dog did it.
  de FS: Mama beschuldigt den Jungen. Der Hund war's.
  EN TP: to blame the cat
  de TP: die Katze beschuldigen
  EN FP: to blame the weather
  de FP: das Wetter beschuldigen
92 | blanket (noun): a large warm cover for a bed | loc: Decke
  EN TS: One blanket, two people.
  de TS: Eine Decke, zwei Leute.
  EN FS: One blanket, three people.
  de FS: Eine Decke, drei Leute.
  EN TP: sharing a big blanket
  de TP: eine große Decke teilen
  EN FP: sharing a big pizza
  de FP: eine große Pizza teilen
93 | blender (noun): the machine whose blades mix food into a drink | loc: Mixer
  EN TS: The blender did it!
  de TS: Der Mixer war's!
  EN FS: The toaster did it!
  de FS: Der Toaster war's!
  EN TP: a smoothie in a blender
  de TP: ein Smoothie im Mixer
  EN FP: a blender full of soup
  de FP: ein Mixer voller Suppe
94 | blink (verb): to quickly close and open your eyes | loc: blinzeln
  EN TS: He blinked first. She won!
  de TS: Er hat zuerst geblinzelt. Sie gewinnt!
  EN FS: She blinked first. He won!
  de FS: Sie hat zuerst geblinzelt. Er gewinnt!
  EN TP: blinking first
  de TP: als Erster blinzeln
  EN FP: blinking at the sun
  de FP: in die Sonne blinzeln
95 | blush (noun): the pink face powder you brush onto your cheeks | loc: Rouge
  EN TS: She is putting on pink blush.
  de TS: Sie trägt rosa Rouge auf.
  EN FS: She is putting on blue blush.
  de FS: Sie trägt blaues Rouge auf.
  EN TP: sweeping on pink blush
  de TP: rosa Rouge auftragen
  EN FP: blushing from shame
  de FP: vor Scham erröten
96 | board (verb): to get on a plane, ship or train as a passenger | loc: einsteigen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is boarding the plane.
  de TS: Sie steigt ins Flugzeug ein.
  EN FS: She is boarding the train.
  de FS: Sie steigt in den Zug ein.
  EN TP: boarding the plane
  de TP: ins Flugzeug einsteigen
  EN FP: boarding the bus
  de FP: in den Bus einsteigen
97 | boil (verb): to heat a liquid until it bubbles | loc: kochen
  EN TS: The water is boiling.
  de TS: Das Wasser kocht.
  EN FS: The milk is boiling.
  de FS: Die Milch kocht.
  EN TP: water at a rolling boil
  de TP: sprudelnd kochendes Wasser
  EN FP: milk at a rolling boil
  de FP: sprudelnd kochende Milch
98 | hammock (noun): a hanging bed of cloth or net you lie in | loc: Hängematte
  EN TS: She is reading in a hammock.
  de TS: Sie liest in einer Hängematte.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in a hammock.
  de FS: Sie schläft in einer Hängematte.
  EN TP: reading in a hammock
  de TP: in einer Hängematte lesen
  EN FP: sleeping in a hammock
  de FP: in einer Hängematte schlafen
99 | book (noun): a set of printed pages inside a cover to read | loc: Buch
  EN TS: She finished the whole book!
  de TS: Sie hat das ganze Buch geschafft!
  EN FS: She finished the whole cake!
  de FS: Sie hat den ganzen Kuchen geschafft!
  EN TP: reading a green book
  de TP: ein grünes Buch lesen
  EN FP: a book on a train
  de FP: ein Buch im Zug
100 | boots (noun): strong shoes that cover your ankle or leg | loc: Stiefel
  EN TS: These boots love mud.
  de TS: Diese Stiefel lieben Schlamm.
  EN FS: These sandals love mud.
  de FS: Diese Sandalen lieben Schlamm.
  EN TP: boots in the mud
  de TP: Stiefel im Schlamm
  EN FP: boots in a shop
  de FP: Stiefel im Laden
101 | bored (adjective): tired and unhappy because nothing is fun | loc: gelangweilt
  EN TS: Ugh. She is so bored.
  de TS: Boah. Sie ist sooo gelangweilt.
  EN FS: Ugh. He is so bored.
  de FS: Boah. Er ist sooo gelangweilt.
  EN TP: bored of waiting
  de TP: gelangweilt vom Warten
  EN FP: bored at a party
  de FP: gelangweilt auf einer Party
102 | boredom (noun): the feeling of having nothing interesting to do | loc: Langeweile
  EN TS: Boredom level: a wet sock on his head.
  de TS: Langeweile-Level: eine nasse Socke auf dem Kopf.
  EN FS: Boredom level: a wet hat on his head.
  de FS: Langeweile-Level: ein nasser Hut auf dem Kopf.
  EN TP: boredom in a laundromat
  de TP: Langeweile im Waschsalon
  EN FP: boredom in a classroom
  de FP: Langeweile im Klassenzimmer
103 | laundromat (noun): a shop of washing machines you pay to use | loc: Waschsalon
  EN TS: Night at the laundromat. Ugh!
  de TS: Nachts im Waschsalon. Boah!
  EN FS: Night at the library. Ugh!
  de FS: Nachts in der Bibliothek. Boah!
  EN TP: waiting at a laundromat
  de TP: im Waschsalon warten
  EN FP: working at a laundromat
  de FP: im Waschsalon arbeiten
104 | bottom (noun): the ground under the sea, a lake or a river | loc: Grund
  EN TS: A stone from the sea bottom!
  de TS: Ein Stein vom Meeresgrund!
  EN FS: A shell from the sea bottom!
  de FS: Eine Muschel vom Meeresgrund!
  EN TP: a stone from the bottom
  de TP: ein Stein vom Grund
  EN FP: the bottom of a glass
  de FP: der Boden eines Glases
105 | bow (noun): a curved weapon with a string that shoots arrows | loc: Bogen
  EN TS: Her bow never misses.
  de TS: Ihr Bogen verfehlt nie.
  EN FS: Her bow always misses.
  de FS: Ihr Bogen verfehlt immer.
  EN TP: drawing a wooden bow
  de TP: einen Holzbogen spannen
  EN FP: a bow and a sword
  de FP: ein Bogen und ein Schwert
106 | aim (verb): to point a weapon carefully at your target | loc: zielen
  EN TS: He is aiming at the hay bale.
  de TS: Er zielt auf den Heuballen.
  EN FS: He is aiming at a tree.
  de FS: Er zielt auf einen Baum.
  EN TP: aiming a bamboo bow
  de TP: mit einem Bambusbogen zielen
  EN FP: aiming a water gun
  de FP: mit einer Wasserpistole zielen
107 | bowl (noun): a round deep dish for soup or cereal | loc: Schüssel
  EN TS: The bowl is his cup now.
  de TS: Die Schüssel ist jetzt seine Tasse.
  EN FS: The pot is his cup now.
  de FS: Der Topf ist jetzt seine Tasse.
  EN TP: drinking from a bowl
  de TP: aus einer Schüssel trinken
  EN FP: washing a blue bowl
  de FP: eine blaue Schüssel spülen
110 | box (noun): a container with flat sides, often of cardboard | loc: Karton
  EN TS: The cat is "helping" with the boxes.
  de TS: Die Katze „hilft“ bei den Kartons.
  EN FS: The dog is "helping" with the boxes.
  de FS: Der Hund „hilft“ bei den Kartons.
  EN TP: a big packed box
  de TP: ein großer gepackter Karton
  EN FP: a box of chocolates
  de FP: eine Schachtel Pralinen
111 | boxing (noun): a sport where two people fight with their fists | loc: Boxen
  EN TS: Boxing makes her so happy.
  de TS: Boxen macht sie so glücklich.
  EN FS: Tennis makes her so happy.
  de FS: Tennis macht sie so glücklich.
  EN TP: boxing with red gloves
  de TP: Boxen mit roten Handschuhen
  EN FP: boxing up old clothes
  de FP: alte Klamotten in Kisten packen
112 | brave (adjective): not afraid to do something scary or hard | loc: mutig
  EN TS: The little girl is brave, her parents not so much.
  de TS: Das kleine Mädchen ist mutig, ihre Eltern eher nicht.
  EN FS: The little boy is brave, his parents not so much.
  de FS: Der kleine Junge ist mutig, seine Eltern eher nicht.
  EN TP: a brave little girl
  de TP: ein mutiges kleines Mädchen
  EN FP: a brave knight in armour
  de FP: ein mutiger Ritter in Rüstung
114 | bread (noun): a baked food made from flour and water | loc: Brot
  EN TS: The bread is still so warm.
  de TS: Das Brot ist noch so warm.
  EN FS: The bread is still so frozen.
  de FS: Das Brot ist noch so gefroren.
  EN TP: warm bread from the oven
  de TP: warmes Brot aus dem Ofen
  EN FP: bread from the supermarket
  de FP: Brot aus dem Supermarkt
115 | breakfast (noun): the first meal of the day | loc: Frühstück
  EN TS: The rooster came for breakfast too.
  de TS: Der Hahn kam auch zum Frühstück.
  EN FS: The dog came for breakfast too.
  de FS: Der Hund kam auch zum Frühstück.
  EN TP: breakfast in the garden
  de TP: Frühstück im Garten
  EN FP: breakfast in bed
  de FP: Frühstück im Bett
116 | breaking (noun): smashing something into pieces | loc: zerbrechen
  EN TS: Breaking stuff is art now!
  de TS: Sachen zerbrechen ist jetzt Kunst!
  EN FS: Painting stuff is art now!
  de FS: Sachen bemalen ist jetzt Kunst!
  EN TP: breaking blue tiles
  de TP: blaue Fliesen zerbrechen
  EN FP: breaking a window
  de FP: ein Fenster einschlagen
117 | mosaic (noun): a picture made of small tiles set side by side | loc: Mosaik
  EN TS: They made a plate mosaic.
  de TS: Sie haben ein Mosaik aus Tellern gemacht.
  EN FS: They made a cup mosaic.
  de FS: Sie haben ein Mosaik aus Tassen gemacht.
  EN TP: a flower mosaic from plates
  de TP: ein Blumenmosaik aus Tellern
  EN FP: a mosaic of glass tiles
  de FP: ein Mosaik aus Glasfliesen
118 | building (noun): the work of making something from parts | loc: zusammenbauen
  EN TS: Building done, time for a high-five!
  de TS: Zusammenbauen erledigt, Zeit für ein High five!
  EN FS: Building done, time for a group hug!
  de FS: Zusammenbauen erledigt, Zeit für eine Gruppenumarmung!
  EN TP: building a raised planter
  de TP: ein Hochbeet zusammenbauen
  EN FP: a tall office building
  de FP: ein hohes Bürogebäude
119 | bulb (noun): the glass part of a lamp that gives light | loc: Glühbirne
  EN TS: Bulb replaced. Task complete.
  de TS: Glühbirne getauscht. Aufgabe erledigt.
  EN FS: Fuse replaced. Task complete.
  de FS: Sicherung getauscht. Aufgabe erledigt.
  EN TP: screwing in a new bulb
  de TP: eine neue Glühbirne eindrehen
  EN FP: a bulb in the garden
  de FP: eine Blumenzwiebel im Garten
120 | burger (noun): a round piece of meat served in a bread roll | loc: Burger
  EN TS: That burger needs both hands!
  de TS: Der Burger braucht beide Hände!
  EN FS: That pizza needs both hands!
  de FS: Die Pizza braucht beide Hände!
  EN TP: a tall cheese burger
  de TP: ein hoher Cheeseburger
  EN FP: a burger in a box
  de FP: ein Burger in einer Schachtel
121 | burn (verb): to damage food or skin with too much heat | loc: verbrennen
  EN TS: He burned the pancake. Oops!
  de TS: Er hat den Pfannkuchen verbrannt. Ups!
  EN FS: He burned the toast. Oops!
  de FS: Er hat den Toast verbrannt. Ups!
  EN TP: a burned black pancake
  de TP: ein verbrannter schwarzer Pfannkuchen
  EN FP: a burned black steak
  de FP: ein verbranntes schwarzes Steak
122 | bus stop (noun): a spot on a street to wait for public transport | loc: Bushaltestelle
  EN TS: They are waiting forever at the bus stop.
  de TS: Sie warten ewig an der Bushaltestelle.
  EN FS: They are waiting forever at the train station.
  de FS: Sie warten ewig am Bahnhof.
  EN TP: waiting at a bus stop
  de TP: an einer Bushaltestelle warten
  EN FP: waiting at a taxi rank
  de FP: an einem Taxistand warten
123 | bush (noun): a plant like a small low tree with many branches | loc: Busch
  EN TS: A bird flew out of the bush!
  de TS: Ein Vogel ist aus dem Busch geflogen!
  EN FS: A cat jumped out of the bush!
  de FS: Eine Katze ist aus dem Busch gesprungen!
  EN TP: picking from the bushes
  de TP: von den Büschen pflücken
  EN FP: hiding behind the bushes
  de FP: sich hinter Büschen verstecken
124 | spread (verb): to push soft food over a surface in a thin layer | loc: streichen
  EN TS: She is spreading a brick of butter.
  de TS: Sie streicht einen ganzen Block Butter.
  EN FS: She is spreading a brick of cheese.
  de FS: Sie streicht einen ganzen Block Käse.
  EN TP: spreading butter on bread
  de TP: Butter aufs Brot streichen
  EN FP: spreading a picnic blanket
  de FP: eine Picknickdecke ausbreiten
125 | butter (noun): a soft yellow food made from cream | loc: Butter
  EN TS: The butter broke the bread!
  de TS: Die Butter hat das Brot zerbrochen!
  EN FS: The jam broke the bread!
  de FS: Die Marmelade hat das Brot zerbrochen!
  EN TP: butter too hard to spread
  de TP: Butter, zu hart zum Streichen
  EN FP: butter in a hot pan
  de FP: Butter in einer heißen Pfanne
126 | button (noun): a small round thing that fastens clothes | loc: Knopf | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He needs help with the buttons.
  de TS: Er braucht Hilfe mit den Knöpfen.
  EN FS: He needs help with the shoelaces.
  de FS: Er braucht Hilfe mit den Schnürsenkeln.
  EN TP: a crooked row of buttons
  de TP: eine schiefe Reihe Knöpfe
  EN FP: pressing a lift button
  de FP: einen Aufzugknopf drücken
127 | cactus (noun): a desert plant covered in sharp spines | loc: Kaktus
  EN TS: This cactus is way too sharp!
  de TS: Dieser Kaktus ist viel zu stachelig!
  EN FS: This palm is way too sharp!
  de FS: Diese Palme ist viel zu stachelig!
  EN TP: sharp cactus spines
  de TP: spitze Kaktusstacheln
  EN FP: a cactus in a pot
  de FP: ein Kaktus im Topf
128 | cake (noun): a sweet baked food, often for birthdays | loc: Kuchen
  EN TS: Her birthday cake has berries.
  de TS: Auf ihrem Geburtstagskuchen sind Beeren.
  EN FS: Her birthday cake has bananas.
  de FS: Auf ihrem Geburtstagskuchen sind Bananen.
  EN TP: a cream birthday cake
  de TP: ein Geburtstagskuchen mit Sahne
  EN FP: a chocolate wedding cake
  de FP: ein Schoko-Hochzeitskuchen
129 | calculator (noun): a small device that does maths for you | loc: Taschenrechner
  EN TS: Five plus three? He needs a calculator.
  de TS: Fünf plus drei? Er braucht einen Taschenrechner.
  EN FS: Nine plus nine? He needs a calculator.
  de FS: Neun plus neun? Er braucht einen Taschenrechner.
  EN TP: a big desk calculator
  de TP: ein großer Taschenrechner
  EN FP: a calculator on a phone
  de FP: ein Taschenrechner auf dem Handy
130 | calendar (noun): a chart showing the days, weeks and months | loc: Kalender
  EN TS: A heart on her calendar? Love!
  de TS: Ein Herz in ihrem Kalender? Liebe!
  EN FS: A star on her calendar? Love!
  de FS: Ein Stern in ihrem Kalender? Liebe!
  EN TP: a heart on the calendar
  de TP: ein Herz im Kalender
  EN FP: a calendar on the desk
  de FP: ein Kalender auf dem Schreibtisch
131 | call (verb): to phone someone and talk to them | loc: anrufen | translator note: noun Anruf used: the English text uses the noun "call", not the verb
  EN TS: This is the best call ever.
  de TS: Bester Anruf aller Zeiten.
  EN FS: This is the worst call ever.
  de FS: Schlimmster Anruf aller Zeiten.
  EN TP: a happy phone call
  de TP: ein fröhlicher Anruf
  EN FP: a call for help
  de FP: ein Hilferuf
132 | calories (noun): the energy units in food you burn off by moving | loc: Kalorien
  EN TS: Cake calories win!
  de TS: Die Kuchen-Kalorien gewinnen!
  EN FS: Salad calories win!
  de FS: Die Salat-Kalorien gewinnen!
  EN TP: burning off calories
  de TP: Kalorien verbrennen
  EN FP: counting calories on a label
  de FP: Kalorien auf dem Etikett zählen
133 | camel (noun): a desert animal with one or two humps | loc: Kamel
  EN TS: The camel is taking a break.
  de TS: Das Kamel macht Pause.
  EN FS: The camel is taking a bath.
  de FS: Das Kamel nimmt ein Bad.
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  de TP: ein Kamel in der Wüste
  EN FP: a camel in the snow
  de FP: ein Kamel im Schnee
134 | camping (noun): sleeping outdoors in a tent for fun | loc: Camping
  EN TS: Camping in a pine forest, so cool.
  de TS: Camping im Kiefernwald, voll cool.
  EN FS: Camping on a sandy beach, so cool.
  de FS: Camping am Sandstrand, voll cool.
  EN TP: camping in a forest
  de TP: Camping im Wald
  EN FP: camping in the garden
  de FP: Camping im Garten
135 | cancel (verb): to say a planned meeting or event is off | loc: absagen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: His plans got cancelled. Yes!
  de TS: Seine Pläne wurden abgesagt. Yes!
  EN FS: His flight got cancelled. Yes!
  de FS: Sein Flug wurde gestrichen. Yes!
  EN TP: cancelling plans tonight
  de TP: Pläne für heute Abend absagen
  EN FP: cancelling a gym membership
  de FP: die Mitgliedschaft im Gym kündigen
136 | candle (noun): a stick of wax with a string you light | loc: Kerze
  EN TS: Candlelight for two? So cute.
  de TS: Kerzenlicht für zwei? So süß.
  EN FS: Lamplight for two? So cute.
  de FS: Lampenlicht für zwei? So süß.
  EN TP: a candle on the table
  de TP: eine Kerze auf dem Tisch
  EN FP: a candle on a cake
  de FP: eine Kerze auf einem Kuchen
137 | canyon (noun): a deep narrow valley with steep rock walls | loc: Schlucht
  EN TS: The canyon shouts back!
  de TS: Die Schlucht ruft zurück!
  EN FS: The forest shouts back!
  de FS: Der Wald ruft zurück!
  EN TP: a narrow slot canyon
  de TP: eine enge Schlucht
  EN FP: a canyon from above
  de FP: eine Schlucht von oben
138 | cap (noun): a soft hat with a stiff part at the front | loc: Kappe
  EN TS: A cap, finally some shade.
  de TS: Eine Kappe, endlich Schatten.
  EN FS: A tree, finally some shade.
  de FS: Ein Baum, endlich Schatten.
  EN TP: a coral cap for shade
  de TP: eine korallenrote Kappe als Schatten
  EN FP: a cap on a bottle
  de FP: die Kappe einer Flasche
139 | capital (noun): the city where a country's government is | loc: Hauptstadt
  EN TS: He found the capital!
  de TS: Er hat die Hauptstadt gefunden!
  EN FS: He found the ocean!
  de FS: Er hat den Ozean gefunden!
  EN TP: the capital below the hill
  de TP: die Hauptstadt unter dem Hügel
  EN FP: a capital letter
  de FP: die Hauptstadt auf der Landkarte
140 | carpet (noun): a thick soft cover for a floor | loc: Teppich
  EN TS: Their new carpet is so soft!
  de TS: Ihr neuer Teppich ist so weich!
  EN FS: Their new sofa is so soft!
  de FS: Ihr neues Sofa ist so weich!
  EN TP: a soft green carpet
  de TP: ein weicher grüner Teppich
  EN FP: a soft green blanket
  de FP: eine weiche grüne Decke
141 | carrot (noun): a long orange vegetable that grows underground | loc: Karotte
  EN TS: This carrot can feed a horse.
  de TS: Diese Karotte reicht für ein Pferd.
  EN FS: This potato can feed a horse.
  de FS: Diese Kartoffel reicht für ein Pferd.
  EN TP: a giant carrot
  de TP: eine Riesenkarotte
  EN FP: a giant potato
  de FP: eine Riesenkartoffel
142 | castle (noun): a large old stone building with strong walls | loc: Burg
  EN TS: It is so big! A real castle.
  de TS: So groß! Eine echte Burg.
  EN FS: It is so small! A real castle.
  de FS: So klein! Eine echte Burg.
  EN TP: a castle on a lake
  de TP: eine Burg an einem See
  EN FP: a castle on a hill
  de FP: eine Burg auf einem Hügel
144 | catch (verb): to take hold of something moving through the air | loc: fangen
  EN TS: He caught the red ball.
  de TS: Er hat den roten Ball gefangen.
  EN FS: He caught the blue ball.
  de FS: Er hat den blauen Ball gefangen.
  EN TP: to catch a red ball
  de TP: einen roten Ball fangen
  EN FP: to catch a cold
  de FP: sich eine Erkältung holen
145 | catching (noun): taking hold of something thrown to you | loc: Fangen
  EN TS: Their catching is really good.
  de TS: Im Fangen sind sie echt gut.
  EN FS: Their kicking is really good.
  de FS: Im Schießen sind sie echt gut.
  EN TP: catching an orange ball
  de TP: einen orangen Ball fangen
  EN FP: catching a cold
  de FP: sich eine Erkältung holen
146 | caterpillar (noun): the young worm-like form of a butterfly | loc: Raupe
  EN TS: This caterpillar has a five-year plan.
  de TS: Diese Raupe hat einen Fünfjahresplan.
  EN FS: This snail has a five-year plan.
  de FS: Diese Schnecke hat einen Fünfjahresplan.
  EN TP: a caterpillar on a leaf
  de TP: eine Raupe auf einem Blatt
  EN FP: a caterpillar in a jar
  de FP: eine Raupe in einem Glas
147 | cave (noun): a large hole in rock you can go into | loc: Höhle
  EN TS: They are walking into a dark cave!
  de TS: Sie gehen in eine dunkle Höhle!
  EN FS: They are walking into a dark house!
  de FS: Sie gehen in ein dunkles Haus!
  EN TP: walking into a dark cave
  de TP: in eine dunkle Höhle gehen
  EN FP: sleeping in a cave
  de FP: in einer Höhle schlafen
148 | celebrate (verb): to do something fun for a special day | loc: feiern
  EN TS: They are celebrating!
  de TS: Sie feiern!
  EN FS: They are studying!
  de FS: Sie lernen!
  EN TP: celebrating a birthday
  de TP: einen Geburtstag feiern
  EN FP: celebrating a wedding
  de FP: eine Hochzeit feiern
149 | censor (verb): to officially hide parts of a text from readers | loc: zensieren
  EN TS: His letter got censored. Rude!
  de TS: Sein Brief wurde zensiert. Frech!
  EN FS: His letter got burned. Rude!
  de FS: Sein Brief wurde verbrannt. Frech!
  EN TP: a censored letter
  de TP: ein zensierter Brief
  EN FP: a censored film
  de FP: ein zensierter Film
150 | cereal (noun): breakfast food made from grain, eaten with milk | loc: Cerealien
  EN TS: He eats cereal without milk!
  de TS: Er isst Cerealien ohne Milch!
  EN FS: He eats cereal without a bowl!
  de FS: Er isst Cerealien ohne Schüssel!
  EN TP: dry cereal in a bowl
  de TP: trockene Cerealien in einer Schüssel
  EN FP: cereal in a box
  de FP: Cerealien in der Packung
151 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: Kette
  EN TS: A chain secures the gate.
  de TS: Eine Kette sichert das Tor.
  EN FS: A rope secures the gate.
  de FS: Ein Seil sichert das Tor.
  EN TP: a chain around a gate
  de TP: eine Kette um ein Tor
  EN FP: a chain around a bike
  de FP: eine Kette um ein Fahrrad
152 | chair (noun): a seat for one person, with a back | loc: Stuhl
  EN TS: Best chair ever! Full circle!
  de TS: Bester Stuhl ever! Volle Drehung!
  EN FS: Best sofa ever! Full circle!
  de FS: Bestes Sofa ever! Volle Drehung!
  EN TP: a new swivel chair
  de TP: ein neuer Drehstuhl
  EN FP: a new rocking chair
  de FP: ein neuer Schaukelstuhl
153 | champagne (noun): a sparkling white wine opened at celebrations | loc: Champagner
  EN TS: The champagne cork is flying!
  de TS: Der Champagner-Korken fliegt!
  EN FS: The champagne glass is flying!
  de FS: Das Champagner-Glas fliegt!
  EN TP: pouring champagne
  de TP: Champagner einschenken
  EN FP: spraying champagne on a podium
  de FP: Champagner auf dem Podium verspritzen
154 | charger (noun): a device that puts power back into a battery | loc: Ladegerät
  EN TS: The charger was in the drawer!
  de TS: Das Ladegerät war in der Schublade!
  EN FS: The charger was in the fridge!
  de FS: Das Ladegerät war im Kühlschrank!
  EN TP: plugging in a charger
  de TP: ein Ladegerät einstecken
  EN FP: a charger for a car
  de FP: ein Ladegerät fürs Auto
155 | cheese (noun): a food made from milk, often yellow | loc: Käse
  EN TS: The cheese stretches forever!
  de TS: Der Käse zieht Fäden ohne Ende!
  EN FS: The bread stretches forever!
  de FS: Das Brot zieht Fäden ohne Ende!
  EN TP: stretchy melted cheese
  de TP: geschmolzener Käse mit Fäden
  EN FP: cheese on a pizza
  de FP: Käse auf einer Pizza
156 | chest (noun): the front upper part of the body | loc: Brust
  EN TS: His medal is on his chest.
  de TS: Seine Medaille ist auf seiner Brust.
  EN FS: His medal is on his head.
  de FS: Seine Medaille ist auf seinem Kopf.
  EN TP: hands on his chest
  de TP: Hände auf der Brust
  EN FP: hands on his head
  de FP: Hände auf dem Kopf
157 | chewing gum (noun): a soft sweet you keep biting but never swallow | loc: Kaugummi
  EN TS: Her chewing gum is so pink.
  de TS: Ihr Kaugummi ist so pink.
  EN FS: Her chewing gum is so green.
  de FS: Ihr Kaugummi ist so grün.
  EN TP: blowing chewing gum bubbles
  de TP: Blasen mit Kaugummi machen
  EN FP: chewing gum under a desk
  de FP: Kaugummi unterm Tisch
158 | chewing (noun): biting food again and again in your mouth | loc: Kauen
  EN TS: The chewing is hard work!
  de TS: Das Kauen ist harte Arbeit!
  EN FS: The walking is hard work!
  de FS: Das Gehen ist harte Arbeit!
  EN TP: chewing sticky toffee
  de TP: zähes Toffee kauen
  EN FP: chewing a pencil
  de FP: auf einem Bleistift kauen
159 | chicken (noun): a farm bird kept for its eggs and meat | loc: Huhn
  EN TS: The chicken laid an egg!
  de TS: Das Huhn hat ein Ei gelegt!
  EN FS: The chicken ate an egg!
  de FS: Das Huhn hat ein Ei gefressen!
  EN TP: a chicken in a coop
  de TP: ein Huhn im Stall
  EN FP: a chicken on a plate
  de FP: ein Huhn auf dem Teller
160 | nest (noun): the straw bed a bird makes to sit on its eggs | loc: Nest
  EN TS: Fact: the hen is in her nest.
  de TS: Fakt: Die Henne sitzt in ihrem Nest.
  EN FS: Fact: the duck is in her nest.
  de FS: Fakt: Die Ente sitzt in ihrem Nest.
  EN TP: a hen in her nest
  de TP: eine Henne in ihrem Nest
  EN FP: a hen building a nest
  de FP: eine Henne baut ein Nest
161 | chicken drumstick (noun): the lower leg of a cooked chicken that you eat | loc: Hähnchenkeule
  EN TS: The dog wants that chicken drumstick.
  de TS: Der Hund will diese Hähnchenkeule.
  EN FS: The cat wants that chicken drumstick.
  de FS: Die Katze will diese Hähnchenkeule.
  EN TP: biting a chicken drumstick
  de TP: in eine Hähnchenkeule beißen
  EN FP: a drumstick for a drum
  de FP: ein Trommelstock für die Trommel
162 | chocolate (noun): a sweet brown food made from cocoa | loc: Schokolade
  EN TS: He is melting chocolate.
  de TS: Er schmilzt Schokolade.
  EN FS: He is melting butter.
  de FS: Er schmilzt Butter.
  EN TP: melting chocolate in a pot
  de TP: Schokolade im Topf schmelzen
  EN FP: a chocolate birthday cake
  de FP: ein Schoko-Geburtstagskuchen
163 | chopsticks (noun): a pair of thin wooden rods for picking up food | loc: Stäbchen
  EN TS: He can use chopsticks now!
  de TS: Er kann jetzt mit Stäbchen essen!
  EN FS: He can use a fork now!
  de FS: Er kann jetzt mit einer Gabel essen!
  EN TP: holding chopsticks
  de TP: Stäbchen halten
  EN FP: breaking chopsticks
  de FP: Stäbchen auseinanderbrechen
164 | dumpling (noun): a small steamed ball of dough with a filling | loc: Dumpling
  EN TS: Whole dumpling, one bite!
  de TS: Ganzer Dumpling, ein Bissen!
  EN FS: Whole pizza, one bite!
  de FS: Ganze Pizza, ein Bissen!
  EN TP: a whole soup dumpling
  de TP: ein ganzer Suppen-Dumpling
  EN FP: making dumplings at home
  de FP: Dumplings zu Hause machen
165 | cinema (noun): a place where you watch films on a big screen | loc: Kino
  EN TS: They are at the cinema.
  de TS: Sie sind im Kino.
  EN FS: They are at the zoo.
  de FS: Sie sind im Zoo.
  EN TP: a dark cinema
  de TP: ein dunkles Kino
  EN FP: a cinema ticket
  de FP: eine Kinokarte
166 | circle (noun): a perfectly round shape | loc: Kreis
  EN TS: They form a perfect circle.
  de TS: Sie bilden einen perfekten Kreis.
  EN FS: They form a perfect line.
  de FS: Sie bilden eine perfekte Linie.
  EN TP: a human circle
  de TP: ein Kreis aus Menschen
  EN FP: a circle of chairs
  de FP: ein Stuhlkreis
167 | citizen (noun): someone who legally belongs to a country | loc: Bürger
  EN TS: A good citizen votes and cleans.
  de TS: Ein guter Bürger wählt und räumt auf.
  EN FS: A good citizen votes and dances.
  de FS: Ein guter Bürger wählt und tanzt.
  EN TP: a proud citizen voting
  de TP: ein stolzer Bürger beim Wählen
  EN FP: a citizen paying taxes
  de FP: ein Bürger zahlt Steuern
168 | citizenship (noun): the legal status of belonging to a country | loc: Staatsbürgerschaft
  EN TS: They got their citizenship!
  de TS: Sie haben ihre Staatsbürgerschaft!
  EN FS: They got their medals!
  de FS: Sie haben ihre Medaillen!
  EN TP: receiving citizenship papers
  de TP: die Staatsbürgerschaft erhalten
  EN FP: losing citizenship
  de FP: die Staatsbürgerschaft verlieren
169 | clay (noun): soft wet earth shaped and baked into pots | loc: Ton
  EN TS: The clay became a bowl.
  de TS: Aus dem Ton wurde eine Schüssel.
  EN FS: The clay became a vase.
  de FS: Aus dem Ton wurde eine Vase.
  EN TP: a wet lump of clay
  de TP: ein nasser Klumpen Ton
  EN FP: a clay tennis court
  de FP: ein Sandplatz beim Tennis
170 | cleaner (noun): a person whose job is to tidy and wash rooms | loc: Reinigungskraft
  EN TS: The cleaner fixed this mess!
  de TS: Die Reinigungskraft hat das Chaos beseitigt!
  EN FS: The cook fixed this mess!
  de FS: Der Koch hat das Chaos beseitigt!
  EN TP: a hotel cleaner
  de TP: eine Reinigungskraft im Hotel
  EN FP: a window cleaner
  de FP: ein Fensterputzer
171 | correct (adjective): right, with no mistakes | loc: richtig
  EN TS: The boy is correct, the girl is not.
  de TS: Der Junge liegt richtig, das Mädchen nicht.
  EN FS: The girl is correct, the boy is not.
  de FS: Das Mädchen liegt richtig, der Junge nicht.
  EN TP: a correct answer
  de TP: eine richtige Antwort
  EN FP: a correct spelling
  de FP: eine richtige Schreibweise
172 | cleats (noun): sports shoes with studs for grip on grass | loc: Stollenschuhe
  EN TS: His cleats grip the wet grass.
  de TS: Seine Stollenschuhe greifen im nassen Gras.
  EN FS: His cleats grip the wet sand.
  de FS: Seine Stollenschuhe greifen im nassen Sand.
  EN TP: lacing up the cleats
  de TP: die Stollenschuhe schnüren
  EN FP: lacing up the skates
  de FP: die Schlittschuhe schnüren
173 | cliff (noun): a high steep wall of rock | loc: Klippe
  EN TS: They are lying on a cliff.
  de TS: Sie liegen auf einer Klippe.
  EN FS: They are lying on a beach.
  de FS: Sie liegen an einem Strand.
  EN TP: the edge of a cliff
  de TP: der Rand einer Klippe
  EN FP: climbing a cliff
  de FP: eine Klippe hochklettern
174 | clinic (noun): a small medical center you visit without staying | loc: Klinik
  EN TS: They are at a clinic desk.
  de TS: Sie stehen am Empfang einer Klinik.
  EN FS: They are at a hotel desk.
  de FS: Sie stehen am Empfang eines Hotels.
  EN TP: a visit to the clinic
  de TP: ein Besuch in der Klinik
  EN FP: a visit to the gym
  de FP: ein Besuch im Fitnessstudio
175 | clock (noun): a device on a wall or table showing the time | loc: Uhr
  EN TS: They are hanging a clock.
  de TS: Sie hängen eine Uhr auf.
  EN FS: They are hanging a picture.
  de FS: Sie hängen ein Bild auf.
  EN TP: a round kitchen clock
  de TP: eine runde Küchenuhr
  EN FP: a round kitchen table
  de FP: ein runder Küchentisch
176 | coal (noun): the black rock that you burn for heat | loc: Kohle
  EN TS: Coal in, fire up!
  de TS: Kohle rein, Feuer an!
  EN FS: Wood in, fire up!
  de FS: Holz rein, Feuer an!
  EN TP: loading coal into the stove
  de TP: Kohle in den Ofen schaufeln
  EN FP: a deep coal mine
  de FP: ein tiefes Kohlebergwerk
177 | coat (noun): a warm jacket you wear over your clothes outside | loc: Mantel
  EN TS: Coat on. Winter, do your worst.
  de TS: Mantel an. Winter, gib alles.
  EN FS: Gloves on. Winter, do your worst.
  de FS: Handschuhe an. Winter, gib alles.
  EN TP: buttoning a long coat
  de TP: einen langen Mantel zuknöpfen
  EN FP: hanging up a long coat
  de FP: einen langen Mantel aufhängen
178 | cocktail (noun): a mixed drink shaken with fruit and ice | loc: Cocktail
  EN TS: The cocktail has an umbrella.
  de TS: Der Cocktail hat ein Schirmchen.
  EN FS: The cocktail has a flag.
  de FS: Der Cocktail hat ein Fähnchen.
  EN TP: a layered orange cocktail
  de TP: ein geschichteter Orangen-Cocktail
  EN FP: a cocktail party dress
  de FP: ein Cocktailkleid
179 | coffee (noun): a hot dark drink made from roasted beans | loc: Kaffee
  EN TS: Coffee works like magic!
  de TS: Kaffee wirkt wie Magie!
  EN FS: Water works like magic!
  de FS: Wasser wirkt wie Magie!
  EN TP: coffee from a moka pot
  de TP: Kaffee aus der Mokkakanne
  EN FP: coffee from a machine
  de FP: Kaffee aus der Maschine
180 | cold (adjective): having a low temperature, not warm | loc: kalt
  EN TS: So cold! Her hand says no.
  de TS: So kalt! Ihre Hand sagt nein.
  EN FS: So hot! Her hand says no.
  de FS: So heiß! Ihre Hand sagt nein.
  EN TP: a cold frozen lake
  de TP: ein kalter, zugefrorener See
  EN FP: a cold drink
  de FP: ein kaltes Getränk
181 | collar (noun): the part of a shirt that goes around your neck | loc: Kragen
  EN TS: Collar up? No way!
  de TS: Kragen hoch? Niemals!
  EN FS: Sleeves up? No way!
  de FS: Ärmel hoch? Niemals!
  EN TP: a collar popped up
  de TP: ein hochgestellter Kragen
  EN FP: a dog's collar
  de FP: ein Hundehalsband
182 | comb (noun): a flat tool with thin teeth to tidy your hair | loc: Kamm
  EN TS: He has an orange comb.
  de TS: Er hat einen orangen Kamm.
  EN FS: He has a blue comb.
  de FS: Er hat einen blauen Kamm.
  EN TP: an orange plastic comb
  de TP: ein orangefarbener Plastikkamm
  EN FP: a comb for a dog
  de FP: ein Kamm für den Hund
183 | comfort (verb): to make a sad person feel better | loc: trösten
  EN TS: Her friend is comforting her.
  de TS: Ihre Freundin tröstet sie.
  EN FS: Her friend is ignoring her.
  de FS: Ihre Freundin ignoriert sie.
  EN TP: comforting a crying friend
  de TP: eine weinende Freundin trösten
  EN FP: comforting a crying baby
  de FP: ein weinendes Baby trösten
184 | command (verb): to give someone an order they must obey | loc: befehlen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She commands, they run.
  de TS: Sie befiehlt, alle rennen.
  EN FS: She commands, they sleep.
  de FS: Sie befiehlt, alle schlafen.
  EN TP: commanding a line of trainees
  de TP: einer Reihe Rekruten befehlen
  EN FP: commanding a ship
  de FP: ein Schiff befehligen
185 | commute (verb): to travel regularly between home and work | loc: pendeln
  EN TS: He commutes by tram. Yawn.
  de TS: Er pendelt mit der Straßenbahn. Gähn.
  EN FS: He commutes by boat. Yawn.
  de FS: Er pendelt mit dem Boot. Gähn.
  EN TP: commuting by tram
  de TP: mit der Straßenbahn pendeln
  EN FP: commuting by bike
  de FP: mit dem Fahrrad pendeln
186 | concert (noun): a show where musicians play live music | loc: Konzert
  EN TS: Even the dog is at the concert!
  de TS: Sogar der Hund ist beim Konzert!
  EN FS: Even the cat is at the concert!
  de FS: Sogar die Katze ist beim Konzert!
  EN TP: an open-air concert
  de TP: ein Open-Air-Konzert
  EN FP: a concert hall
  de FP: ein Konzertsaal
187 | confused (adjective): not able to understand what is going on | loc: verwirrt
  EN TS: The instructions confused her.
  de TS: Die Anleitung hat sie verwirrt.
  EN FS: The map confused her.
  de FS: Die Landkarte hat sie verwirrt.
  EN TP: confused by the instructions
  de TP: verwirrt von der Anleitung
  EN FP: confused about the date
  de FP: verwirrt wegen des Datums
188 | constitution (noun): the basic written law of a country | loc: Verfassung
  EN TS: The constitution says no.
  de TS: Die Verfassung sagt nein.
  EN FS: The constitution says yes.
  de FS: Die Verfassung sagt ja.
  EN TP: reading the constitution
  de TP: die Verfassung lesen
  EN FP: writing a new constitution
  de FP: eine neue Verfassung schreiben
189 | convoy (noun): a group of vehicles traveling together | loc: Konvoi
  EN TS: Three cars form a convoy.
  de TS: Drei Autos bilden einen Konvoi.
  EN FS: Five cars form a convoy.
  de FS: Fünf Autos bilden einen Konvoi.
  EN TP: a convoy of sports cars
  de TP: ein Konvoi aus Sportwagen
  EN FP: a convoy of trucks
  de FP: ein Konvoi aus Lkws
190 | cookie (noun): a small flat sweet baked snack | loc: Keks
  EN TS: She is dunking her cookie.
  de TS: Sie tunkt ihren Keks ein.
  EN FS: She is dunking her bread.
  de FS: Sie tunkt ihr Brot ein.
  EN TP: dunking a cookie
  de TP: einen Keks eintunken
  EN FP: baking a cookie cake
  de FP: einen Keks-Kuchen backen
191 | corkscrew (noun): a tool with a metal spiral for pulling corks | loc: Korkenzieher
  EN TS: He is using a corkscrew.
  de TS: Er benutzt einen Korkenzieher.
  EN FS: He is using a knife.
  de FS: Er benutzt ein Messer.
  EN TP: twisting in a corkscrew
  de TP: einen Korkenzieher eindrehen
  EN FP: a corkscrew in a drawer
  de FP: ein Korkenzieher in der Schublade
192 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: Ecke
  EN TS: They are hiding round the corner!
  de TS: Sie verstecken sich um die Ecke!
  EN FS: They are hiding under the table!
  de FS: Sie verstecken sich unter dem Tisch!
  EN TP: around the corner
  de TP: um die Ecke
  EN FP: a corner shop
  de FP: ein Laden an der Ecke
193 | corrupt (adjective): using power dishonestly to get money | loc: korrupt
  EN TS: What a corrupt official!
  de TS: Was für ein korrupter Beamter!
  EN FS: What an honest official!
  de FS: Was für ein ehrlicher Beamter!
  EN TP: a corrupt official
  de TP: ein korrupter Beamter
  EN FP: a corrupt computer file
  de FP: eine beschädigte Datei
194 | cotton (noun): a soft white plant fiber used to make cloth | loc: Baumwolle
  EN TS: The cotton is so soft.
  de TS: Die Baumwolle ist so weich.
  EN FS: The wool is so soft.
  de FS: Die Wolle ist so weich.
  EN TP: picking soft cotton
  de TP: weiche Baumwolle pflücken
  EN FP: buying cotton sheets
  de FP: Bettwäsche aus Baumwolle kaufen
195 | coughing (noun): loud bursts of air from your throat when ill | loc: Husten
  EN TS: Honey tea stops the coughing.
  de TS: Honigtee stoppt den Husten.
  EN FS: Cold beer stops the coughing.
  de FS: Kaltes Bier stoppt den Husten.
  EN TP: coughing in an armchair
  de TP: Husten im Sessel
  EN FP: coughing at a concert
  de FP: Husten im Konzert
196 | courage (noun): being able to act even when you are afraid | loc: Mut
  EN TS: Courage got her across!
  de TS: Mut hat sie rübergebracht!
  EN FS: A zip line got her across!
  de FS: Eine Seilrutsche hat sie rübergebracht!
  EN TP: crossing with courage
  de TP: mit Mut hinüber
  EN FP: the courage to jump down
  de FP: der Mut, runterzuspringen
197 | cow (noun): a large farm animal that gives milk | loc: Kuh
  EN TS: The cow is being milked.
  de TS: Die Kuh wird gemolken.
  EN FS: The goat is being milked.
  de FS: Die Ziege wird gemolken.
  EN TP: a cow with a bell
  de TP: eine Kuh mit Glocke
  EN FP: a cow with a hat
  de FP: eine Kuh mit Hut
198 | cramp (noun): a sudden painful tightening of a muscle | loc: Krampf
  EN TS: A cramp stopped her run.
  de TS: Ein Krampf hat ihren Lauf gestoppt.
  EN FS: A cramp stopped her swim.
  de FS: Ein Krampf hat ihr Schwimmen gestoppt.
  EN TP: a cramp in the calf
  de TP: ein Krampf in der Wade
  EN FP: a cramp in the hand
  de FP: ein Krampf in der Hand
199 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: krachen
  EN TS: He is crashing into everyone!
  de TS: Er kracht in alle rein!
  EN FS: He is crashing into a wall!
  de FS: Er kracht gegen eine Wand!
  EN TP: crashing bumper cars
  de TP: krachende Autoscooter
  EN FP: crashing a real car
  de FP: ein krachender echter Unfall
200 | cream (noun): the thick fatty part of milk | loc: Sahne
  EN TS: He is holding cream over his head!
  de TS: Er hält Sahne über seinen Kopf!
  EN FS: He is holding soup over his head!
  de FS: Er hält Suppe über seinen Kopf!
  EN TP: stiff whipped cream
  de TP: steif geschlagene Sahne
  EN FP: a cream for the face
  de FP: eine Creme fürs Gesicht
201 | crocodile (noun): a big reptile with a long body and sharp teeth | loc: Krokodil
  EN TS: Nice teeth, crocodile!
  de TS: Schöne Zähne, Krokodil!
  EN FS: Nice teeth, lion!
  de FS: Schöne Zähne, Löwe!
  EN TP: a crocodile with open jaws
  de TP: ein Krokodil mit offenem Maul
  EN FP: a crocodile with closed eyes
  de FP: ein Krokodil mit geschlossenen Augen
202 | cross (verb): to go from one side of a road to the other | loc: überqueren
  EN TS: Phone down. Now he can cross.
  de TS: Handy weg. Jetzt kann er die Straße überqueren.
  EN FS: Phone down. Now he can swim.
  de FS: Handy weg. Jetzt kann er schwimmen.
  EN TP: to cross the street safely
  de TP: sicher die Straße überqueren
  EN FP: to cross your fingers
  de FP: die Daumen drücken
203 | cruise (noun): a holiday trip on a large ship | loc: Kreuzfahrt
  EN TS: Their cruise has dolphins too!
  de TS: Auf ihrer Kreuzfahrt gibt's sogar Delfine!
  EN FS: Their cruise has sharks too!
  de FS: Auf ihrer Kreuzfahrt gibt's sogar Haie!
  EN TP: a cruise to tropical islands
  de TP: eine Kreuzfahrt zu tropischen Inseln
  EN FP: a cruise to Antarctica
  de FP: eine Kreuzfahrt in die Antarktis
204 | crutch (noun): a stick under the arm that helps you walk | loc: Krücke
  EN TS: He is racing on his crutches!
  de TS: Er rast auf seinen Krücken!
  EN FS: He is racing on his bike!
  de FS: Er rast auf seinem Fahrrad!
  EN TP: walking on two crutches
  de TP: an zwei Krücken gehen
  EN FP: leaning on one crutch
  de FP: sich auf eine Krücke stützen
205 | crying (noun): letting tears fall because you feel sad | loc: Weinen
  EN TS: Sad film. Both are crying.
  de TS: Trauriger Film. Beide weinen.
  EN FS: Sad film. Both are sleeping.
  de FS: Trauriger Film. Beide schlafen.
  EN TP: crying at a sad film
  de TP: Weinen bei einem traurigen Film
  EN FP: crying at a wedding
  de FP: Weinen bei einer Hochzeit
206 | cucumber (noun): a long green vegetable often eaten in salads | loc: Gurke
  EN TS: Her cucumber spa is cheap.
  de TS: Ihr Gurken-Spa ist billig.
  EN FS: Her lemon spa is cheap.
  de FS: Ihr Zitronen-Spa ist billig.
  EN TP: cucumber slices on the eyes
  de TP: Gurkenscheiben auf den Augen
  EN FP: cucumber in a sandwich
  de FP: Gurke im Sandwich
207 | cup (noun): a small container with a handle for hot drinks | loc: Tasse
  EN TS: Her cup is small and green.
  de TS: Ihre Tasse ist klein und grün.
  EN FS: Her cup is small and blue.
  de FS: Ihre Tasse ist klein und blau.
  EN TP: a small green cup
  de TP: eine kleine grüne Tasse
  EN FP: a cup of coffee
  de FP: eine Tasse Kaffee
209 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: neugierig
  EN TS: Curious cat, no privacy.
  de TS: Neugierige Katze, null Privatsphäre.
  EN FS: Curious dog, no privacy.
  de FS: Neugieriger Hund, null Privatsphäre.
  EN TP: a curious cat peeking in
  de TP: eine neugierige Katze späht rein
  EN FP: a curious dog peeking in
  de FP: ein neugieriger Hund späht rein
210 | customer (noun): a person who buys things in a shop | loc: Kunde
  EN TS: She is a happy customer.
  de TS: Sie ist eine glückliche Kundin.
  EN FS: She is a sad customer.
  de FS: Sie ist eine traurige Kundin.
  EN TP: a customer at the counter
  de TP: eine Kundin an der Theke
  EN FP: a customer at the door
  de FP: eine Kundin an der Tür
211 | customs (noun): the border check on what you bring into a country | loc: Zoll
  EN TS: "Just one fruit!" Customs said no.
  de TS: „Nur ein Stück Obst!“ Der Zoll sagte nein.
  EN FS: "Just one shoe!" Customs said no.
  de FS: „Nur ein Schuh!“ Der Zoll sagte nein.
  EN TP: a fruit at customs
  de TP: eine Frucht beim Zoll
  EN FP: a fruit at the market
  de FP: eine Frucht auf dem Markt
212 | dancer (noun): a person who moves to music as art or as a job | loc: Tänzer
  EN TS: This dancer has great moves.
  de TS: Dieser Tänzer hat richtig gute Moves.
  EN FS: This singer has great moves.
  de FS: Dieser Sänger hat richtig gute Moves.
  EN TP: a hip-hop dancer
  de TP: ein Hip-Hop-Tänzer
  EN FP: a ballet dancer on stage
  de FP: ein Balletttänzer auf der Bühne
213 | dancing (noun): moving your body to the beat of music | loc: Tanzen
  EN TS: His dancing is really smooth.
  de TS: Sein Tanzen ist echt smooth.
  EN FS: His singing is really smooth.
  de FS: Sein Singen ist echt smooth.
  EN TP: salsa dancing in the kitchen
  de TP: Salsa tanzen in der Küche
  EN FP: dancing in the rain
  de FP: Tanzen im Regen
214 | dangerous (adjective): likely to hurt you or cause harm | loc: gefährlich
  EN TS: This ice is dangerous!
  de TS: Dieses Eis ist gefährlich!
  EN FS: This ice is safe!
  de FS: Dieses Eis ist sicher!
  EN TP: dangerous thin ice
  de TP: gefährlich dünnes Eis
  EN FP: dangerous ice on a road
  de FP: gefährliches Glatteis auf der Straße
215 | darkness (noun): the state when there is no light | loc: Dunkelheit
  EN TS: The room fell into darkness.
  de TS: Der Raum versank in Dunkelheit.
  EN FS: The garden fell into darkness.
  de FS: Der Garten versank in Dunkelheit.
  EN TP: a kitchen in darkness
  de TP: eine Küche in Dunkelheit
  EN FP: darkness in a cinema
  de FP: Dunkelheit im Kino
217 | dart (noun): a small pointed arrow you throw at a round board | loc: Dartpfeil
  EN TS: Her dart is near the bullseye!
  de TS: Ihr Dartpfeil steckt nah am Bullseye!
  EN FS: Her dart is near the door!
  de FS: Ihr Dartpfeil steckt nah an der Tür!
  EN TP: throwing a turquoise dart
  de TP: einen türkisen Dartpfeil werfen
  EN FP: throwing a turquoise ball
  de FP: einen türkisen Ball werfen
218 | declare (verb): to announce something officially in public | loc: verkünden
  EN TS: She declared the bridge open.
  de TS: Sie verkündete die Eröffnung der Brücke.
  EN FS: She declared the school open.
  de FS: Sie verkündete die Eröffnung der Schule.
  EN TP: declaring the bridge open
  de TP: die Eröffnung der Brücke verkünden
  EN FP: declaring goods at customs
  de FP: Waren beim Zoll anmelden
219 | deer (noun): a wild forest animal, the males have antlers | loc: Hirsch
  EN TS: The deer is shouting at us!
  de TS: Der Hirsch schreit uns an!
  EN FS: The deer is running at us!
  de FS: Der Hirsch rennt auf uns zu!
  EN TP: a deer in the fog
  de TP: ein Hirsch im Nebel
  EN FP: a deer in the snow
  de FP: ein Hirsch im Schnee
220 | defrost (verb): to let frozen food become soft again | loc: auftauen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He defrosted the fish.
  de TS: Er hat den Fisch aufgetaut.
  EN FS: He defrosted the chicken.
  de FS: Er hat das Hähnchen aufgetaut.
  EN TP: a defrosted fish fillet
  de TP: ein aufgetautes Fischfilet
  EN FP: defrosting the car window
  de FP: die Autoscheibe auftauen
221 | degree (noun): the qualification you get for finishing university | loc: Hochschulabschluss
  EN TS: She is holding up her degree.
  de TS: Sie hält ihren Hochschulabschluss in die Höhe.
  EN FS: She is holding up her baby.
  de FS: Sie hält ihr Baby in die Höhe.
  EN TP: holding up her degree
  de TP: ihren Hochschulabschluss hochhalten
  EN FP: studying for her degree
  de FP: für ihren Hochschulabschluss lernen
222 | delay (noun): when something happens later than planned | loc: Verspätung
  EN TS: This delay is taking forever.
  de TS: Diese Verspätung dauert ewig.
  EN FS: This train is taking forever.
  de FS: Dieser Zug dauert ewig.
  EN TP: a delay at the station
  de TP: eine Verspätung am Bahnhof
  EN FP: a delay at the airport
  de FP: eine Verspätung am Flughafen
223 | delivery (noun): bringing food or goods to someone's door | loc: Lieferung
  EN TS: The delivery is finally here!
  de TS: Die Lieferung ist endlich da!
  EN FS: The plumber is finally here!
  de FS: Der Klempner ist endlich da!
  EN TP: a food delivery
  de TP: eine Essenslieferung
  EN FP: a parcel delivery
  de FP: eine Paketlieferung
224 | designing (noun): planning how something will look before making it | loc: entwerfen
  EN TS: Designing a chair is fun.
  de TS: Einen Stuhl zu entwerfen macht Spaß.
  EN FS: Designing a table is fun.
  de FS: Einen Tisch zu entwerfen macht Spaß.
  EN TP: designing a model chair
  de TP: einen Modellstuhl entwerfen
  EN FP: designing a dress
  de FP: ein Kleid entwerfen
225 | desk (noun): a table you sit at to work or study | loc: Schreibtisch
  EN TS: Her desk is ready. The cat agrees.
  de TS: Ihr Schreibtisch ist bereit. Die Katze stimmt zu.
  EN FS: Her desk is ready. The dog agrees.
  de FS: Ihr Schreibtisch ist bereit. Der Hund stimmt zu.
  EN TP: a clean desk for work
  de TP: ein aufgeräumter Schreibtisch zum Arbeiten
  EN FP: a clean desk for dinner
  de FP: ein aufgeräumter Schreibtisch zum Essen
226 | despair (noun): the feeling of losing all hope | loc: Verzweiflung
  EN TS: Empty case, total despair.
  de TS: Leerer Koffer, totale Verzweiflung.
  EN FS: Full case, total despair.
  de FS: Voller Koffer, totale Verzweiflung.
  EN TP: despair in an empty tunnel
  de TP: Verzweiflung in einem leeren Tunnel
  EN FP: despair after an exam
  de FP: Verzweiflung nach einer Prüfung
227 | diamond (noun): a very hard, sparkling stone used in jewelry | loc: Diamant
  EN TS: That diamond is on fire!
  de TS: Dieser Diamant brennt ja!
  EN FS: That ruby is on fire!
  de FS: Dieser Rubin brennt ja!
  EN TP: a sparkling diamond ring
  de TP: ein funkelnder Diamantring
  EN FP: a diamond necklace
  de FP: eine Diamantkette
228 | dinner (noun): the main meal of the evening | loc: Abendessen
  EN TS: Dinner by the sea is not bad.
  de TS: Abendessen am Meer ist nicht übel.
  EN FS: Dinner by the pool is not bad.
  de FS: Abendessen am Pool ist nicht übel.
  EN TP: dinner on the terrace
  de TP: Abendessen auf der Terrasse
  EN FP: dinner in the kitchen
  de FP: Abendessen in der Küche
229 | diploma (noun): the official paper you get for finishing a course | loc: Diplom
  EN TS: He got his diploma at last!
  de TS: Er hat endlich sein Diplom!
  EN FS: He got his medal at last!
  de FS: Er hat endlich seine Medaille!
  EN TP: receiving a diploma
  de TP: ein Diplom erhalten
  EN FP: framing a diploma
  de FP: ein Diplom einrahmen
230 | director (noun): the person who runs a film and directs the actors | loc: Regisseur
  EN TS: The director wants it slower.
  de TS: Der Regisseur will es langsamer.
  EN FS: The director wants it faster.
  de FS: Der Regisseur will es schneller.
  EN TP: a director shouting cut
  de TP: ein Regisseur ruft „Cut!“
  EN FP: a director of a bank
  de FP: ein Bankdirektor
231 | disappoint (verb): to make someone sad by not doing what they hoped | loc: enttäuschen
  EN TS: He disappointed her badly.
  de TS: Er hat sie schwer enttäuscht.
  EN FS: He disappointed his boss.
  de FS: Er hat seinen Chef enttäuscht.
  EN TP: disappointing his partner
  de TP: seine Partnerin enttäuschen
  EN FP: disappointing test results
  de FP: enttäuschende Testergebnisse
232 | disappointed (adjective): sad because something was not as good as you hoped | loc: enttäuscht
  EN TS: He is a little disappointed.
  de TS: Er ist ein kleines bisschen enttäuscht.
  EN FS: She is a little disappointed.
  de FS: Sie ist ein kleines bisschen enttäuscht.
  EN TP: a disappointed customer
  de TP: ein enttäuschter Kunde
  EN FP: disappointed by the rain
  de FP: enttäuscht vom Regen
233 | dislocate (verb): to push a bone out of its normal place in a joint | loc: ausrenken | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He dislocated his shoulder.
  de TS: Er hat sich die Schulter ausgerenkt.
  EN FS: He dislocated his knee.
  de FS: Er hat sich das Knie ausgerenkt.
  EN TP: a dislocated shoulder
  de TP: eine ausgerenkte Schulter
  EN FP: a dislocated finger
  de FP: ein ausgerenkter Finger
234 | dissolve (verb): to mix into a liquid and disappear | loc: sich auflösen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The sugar dissolved. Magic!
  de TS: Der Zucker hat sich aufgelöst. Magie!
  EN FS: The salt dissolved. Magic!
  de FS: Das Salz hat sich aufgelöst. Magie!
  EN TP: a sugar cube dissolving
  de TP: ein Zuckerwürfel löst sich auf
  EN FP: a pill dissolving
  de FP: eine Tablette löst sich auf
235 | fetch (verb): to run after something and bring it back | loc: apportieren
  EN TS: Dude, he fetched the ball.
  de TS: Alter, er hat den Ball apportiert.
  EN FS: Dude, he fetched a stick.
  de FS: Alter, er hat einen Stock apportiert.
  EN TP: fetching a red ball
  de TP: einen roten Ball apportieren
  EN FP: fetching a red apple
  de FP: einen roten Apfel apportieren
236 | dolphin (noun): a smart sea animal that jumps and plays | loc: Delfin
  EN TS: The dolphin is racing a boat.
  de TS: Der Delfin liefert sich ein Rennen mit einem Boot.
  EN FS: The dolphin is racing a shark.
  de FS: Der Delfin liefert sich ein Rennen mit einem Hai.
  EN TP: a dolphin beside a boat
  de TP: ein Delfin neben einem Boot
  EN FP: a dolphin in a pool
  de FP: ein Delfin im Becken
237 | donkey (noun): a small grey animal with long ears | loc: Esel
  EN TS: The donkey is rolling in the dust like it's a spa.
  de TS: Der Esel wälzt sich im Staub, als wär's ein Spa.
  EN FS: The donkey is rolling in the mud like it's a spa.
  de FS: Der Esel wälzt sich im Schlamm, als wär's ein Spa.
  EN TP: a donkey rolling in dust
  de TP: ein Esel wälzt sich im Staub
  EN FP: a donkey carrying a bag
  de FP: ein Esel trägt eine Tasche
238 | steal (verb): to take something that is not yours | loc: stehlen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He stole a drink!
  de TS: Er hat ein Getränk gestohlen!
  EN FS: He stole a shoe!
  de FS: Er hat einen Schuh gestohlen!
  EN TP: stealing a customer's drink
  de TP: das Getränk eines Kunden stehlen
  EN FP: stealing a customer's parcel
  de FP: das Paket eines Kunden stehlen
239 | doubt (verb): to not be sure that something is true | loc: bezweifeln
  EN TS: He doubts the ring is gold.
  de TS: Er bezweifelt, dass der Ring aus Gold ist.
  EN FS: He is sure the ring is gold.
  de FS: Er ist sicher, dass der Ring aus Gold ist.
  EN TP: doubting a gold ring
  de TP: die Echtheit eines Goldrings bezweifeln
  EN FP: doubting his girlfriend
  de FP: die Treue seiner Freundin bezweifeln
240 | draw (noun): a result where neither side wins | loc: Unentschieden
  EN TS: Grandma calls it a draw.
  de TS: Oma erklärt es zum Unentschieden.
  EN FS: The dog calls it a draw.
  de FS: Der Hund erklärt es zum Unentschieden.
  EN TP: an arm-wrestling draw
  de TP: ein Unentschieden beim Armdrücken
  EN FP: a draw in football
  de FP: ein Unentschieden im Fußball
241 | drawing (noun): making pictures with a pencil or pen | loc: Zeichnung
  EN TS: The drawing looks just like the real harbour!
  de TS: Die Zeichnung sieht genau aus wie der echte Hafen!
  EN FS: The drawing looks just like the real mountain!
  de FS: Die Zeichnung sieht genau aus wie der echte Berg!
  EN TP: a pencil drawing of houses
  de TP: eine Bleistiftzeichnung von Häusern
  EN FP: a drawing on a wall
  de FP: eine Zeichnung an einer Wand
242 | dress (noun): a one-piece item of clothing with a skirt | loc: Kleid
  EN TS: Spin again! Great dress!
  de TS: Dreh dich nochmal! Tolles Kleid!
  EN FS: Spin again! Great hat!
  de FS: Dreh dich nochmal! Toller Hut!
  EN TP: a red summer dress
  de TP: ein rotes Sommerkleid
  EN FP: a red wedding dress
  de FP: ein rotes Hochzeitskleid
243 | dressing (noun): putting on your clothes | loc: das Anziehen
  EN TS: Winter dressing is hard work!
  de TS: Anziehen im Winter ist Schwerstarbeit!
  EN FS: Summer dressing is hard work!
  de FS: Anziehen im Sommer ist Schwerstarbeit!
  EN TP: fast dressing for winter
  de TP: schnelles Anziehen für den Winter
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  de FP: einen Salat anmachen
244 | drink (noun): a liquid you swallow, like juice or water | loc: Getränk
  EN TS: One drink was not enough.
  de TS: Ein Getränk war nicht genug.
  EN FS: One sandwich was not enough.
  de FS: Ein Sandwich war nicht genug.
  EN TP: a fresh orange drink
  de TP: ein frisches Orangengetränk
  EN FP: a hot drink
  de FP: ein heißes Getränk
245 | drinking (noun): taking liquid into your mouth and swallowing | loc: das Trinken
  EN TS: She is drinking like a camel!
  de TS: Sie trinkt wie ein Kamel!
  EN FS: She is eating like a camel!
  de FS: Sie isst wie ein Kamel!
  EN TP: drinking from a steel bottle
  de TP: aus einer Stahlflasche trinken
  EN FP: drinking at a party
  de FP: Trinken auf einer Party
246 | driving (noun): controlling a car as it moves along | loc: das Fahren
  EN TS: That driving is so smooth.
  de TS: Das Fahren ist so smooth.
  EN FS: That cycling is so smooth.
  de FS: Das Radfahren ist so smooth.
  EN TP: driving along the coast
  de TP: Fahren entlang der Küste
  EN FP: driving through the city
  de FP: Fahren durch die Stadt
247 | drop (verb): to let something fall | loc: fallen lassen
  EN TS: He is dropping the apple for science.
  de TS: Er lässt den Apfel für die Wissenschaft fallen.
  EN FS: He is throwing the apple for science.
  de FS: Er wirft den Apfel für die Wissenschaft.
  EN TP: to drop an apple
  de TP: einen Apfel fallen lassen
  EN FP: to drop a glass
  de FP: ein Glas fallen lassen
248 | dropper (noun): a small glass tube with a bulb for giving drops | loc: Pipette
  EN TS: She is dosing with a dropper.
  de TS: Sie dosiert mit einer Pipette.
  EN FS: She is dosing with a syringe.
  de FS: Sie dosiert mit einer Spritze.
  EN TP: squeezing a glass dropper
  de TP: eine Glaspipette drücken
  EN FP: dropping a glass dropper
  de FP: eine Glaspipette fallen lassen
250 | duck (noun): a water bird with a flat beak | loc: Ente
  EN TS: The duck is doing a headstand!
  de TS: Die Ente macht einen Kopfstand!
  EN FS: The swan is doing a headstand!
  de FS: Der Schwan macht einen Kopfstand!
  EN TP: a duck on a pond
  de TP: eine Ente auf einem Teich
  EN FP: a duck in the rain
  de FP: eine Ente im Regen
251 | dumbbell (noun): a short bar with a weight at each end | loc: Hantel
  EN TS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's sipping coffee.
  de TS: Er stemmt die Hantel, sie schlürft Kaffee.
  EN FS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's eating cake.
  de FS: Er stemmt die Hantel, sie isst Kuchen.
  EN TP: curling a heavy dumbbell
  de TP: Curls mit einer schweren Hantel
  EN FP: a dumbbell on the sofa
  de FP: eine Hantel auf dem Sofa
252 | dust (noun): tiny dry bits of dirt that cover surfaces | loc: Staub
  EN TS: He blew a huge cloud of dust!
  de TS: Er hat eine riesige Wolke aus Staub gepustet!
  EN FS: He blew a huge cloud of smoke!
  de FS: Er hat eine riesige Wolke aus Rauch gepustet!
  EN TP: a cloud of dust
  de TP: eine Wolke aus Staub
  EN FP: a cloud of smoke
  de FP: eine Wolke aus Rauch
253 | dusting (noun): wiping fine dirt off shelves and furniture | loc: Staubwischen
  EN TS: Dusting is a team sport here.
  de TS: Staubwischen ist hier Teamsport.
  EN FS: Cooking is a team sport here.
  de FS: Kochen ist hier Teamsport.
  EN TP: dusting a lampshade
  de TP: Staubwischen am Lampenschirm
  EN FP: dusting a cake with sugar
  de FP: einen Kuchen mit Zucker bestäuben
254 | earth (noun): the planet we live on | loc: Erde
  EN TS: They are spinning the Earth!
  de TS: Sie drehen die Erde!
  EN FS: They are painting the Earth!
  de FS: Sie bemalen die Erde!
  EN TP: the Earth on a desk
  de TP: die Erde auf dem Schreibtisch
  EN FP: a map of the Earth
  de FP: eine Karte der Erde
255 | east (noun): the direction where the sun comes up | loc: Osten
  EN TS: The sun rises in the east.
  de TS: Die Sonne geht im Osten auf.
  EN FS: The sun rises in the west.
  de FS: Die Sonne geht im Westen auf.
  EN TP: facing the east at dawn
  de TP: im Morgengrauen nach Osten schauen
  EN FP: going east by train
  de FP: mit dem Zug nach Osten fahren
256 | eating (noun): putting food in your mouth and swallowing it | loc: Essen
  EN TS: All that eating made them full.
  de TS: Das viele Essen hat sie satt gemacht.
  EN FS: All that eating made them hungry.
  de FS: Das viele Essen hat sie hungrig gemacht.
  EN TP: eating noodle soup
  de TP: Nudelsuppe essen
  EN FP: eating a sandwich
  de FP: ein Sandwich essen
258 | edge (noun): the line or border where a surface or object ends | loc: Rand
  EN TS: Careful, that is the edge!
  de TS: Vorsicht, da ist der Rand!
  EN FS: Careful, that is the hole!
  de FS: Vorsicht, da ist das Loch!
  EN TP: the edge of the dock
  de TP: der Rand des Stegs
  EN FP: the edge of a knife
  de FP: die Klinge eines Messers
259 | eerie (adjective): strange and a bit scary, in a quiet unsettling way | loc: unheimlich
  EN TS: The sky is eerie. Aliens?
  de TS: Der Himmel ist unheimlich. Aliens?
  EN FS: The sea is eerie. Aliens?
  de FS: Das Meer ist unheimlich. Aliens?
  EN TP: an eerie red glow
  de TP: ein unheimliches rotes Leuchten
  EN FP: an eerie silent forest
  de FP: ein unheimlich stiller Wald
260 | egg (noun): an oval thing laid by a hen, used as food | loc: Ei
  EN TS: He is frying an egg.
  de TS: Er brät ein Ei.
  EN FS: He is boiling an egg.
  de FS: Er kocht ein Ei.
  EN TP: a fried egg on toast
  de TP: ein Spiegelei auf Toast
  EN FP: a boiled egg
  de FP: ein gekochtes Ei
261 | electrician (noun): a worker who fixes wires and power in homes | loc: Elektriker
  EN TS: The electrician is the hero!
  de TS: Der Elektriker ist der Held!
  EN FS: The plumber is the hero!
  de FS: Der Klempner ist der Held!
  EN TP: an electrician at work
  de TP: ein Elektriker bei der Arbeit
  EN FP: an electrician on a roof
  de FP: ein Elektriker auf einem Dach
262 | elephant (noun): a huge grey animal with a long trunk | loc: Elefant
  EN TS: Free shower for the elephant.
  de TS: Gratis-Dusche für den Elefanten.
  EN FS: Free shower for the giraffe.
  de FS: Gratis-Dusche für die Giraffe.
  EN TP: an elephant at a waterhole
  de TP: ein Elefant am Wasserloch
  EN FP: an elephant in a circus
  de FP: ein Elefant im Zirkus
263 | emerge (verb): to come into view from inside or under something | loc: auftauchen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is emerging from the lake!
  de TS: Sie taucht aus dem See auf!
  EN FS: She is emerging from the snow!
  de FS: Sie taucht aus dem Schnee auf!
  EN TP: emerging from the water
  de TP: aus dem Wasser auftauchen
  EN FP: emerging from a cave
  de FP: aus einer Höhle auftauchen
264 | emotion (noun): a strong feeling like joy or sadness | loc: Emotion
  EN TS: So much emotion at arrivals!
  de TS: So viel Emotion in der Ankunftshalle!
  EN FS: So much emotion at departures!
  de FS: So viel Emotion in der Abflughalle!
  EN TP: full of emotion
  de TP: voller Emotion
  EN FP: hiding her emotion
  de FP: ihre Emotion verbergen
265 | employee (noun): a person who works for a company or a boss | loc: Angestellter
  EN TS: The employee got paid!
  de TS: Der Angestellte hat sein Gehalt bekommen!
  EN FS: The employee got fired!
  de FS: Der Angestellte wurde gefeuert!
  EN TP: a happy employee
  de TP: ein glücklicher Angestellter
  EN FP: a new employee
  de FP: ein neuer Angestellter
266 | energy (noun): the strength to be active and do things | loc: Energie
  EN TS: She has way too much energy!
  de TS: Sie hat viel zu viel Energie!
  EN FS: He has way too much energy!
  de FS: Er hat viel zu viel Energie!
  EN TP: full of energy
  de TP: voller Energie
  EN FP: energy from the sun
  de FP: Energie aus der Sonne
267 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: Ingenieur
  EN TS: The engineer made a robot arm.
  de TS: Der Ingenieur hat einen Roboterarm gebaut.
  EN FS: The engineer made a robot dog.
  de FS: Der Ingenieur hat einen Roboterhund gebaut.
  EN TP: an engineer in a lab
  de TP: ein Ingenieur im Labor
  EN FP: an engineer on a bridge
  de FP: ein Ingenieur auf einer Brücke
268 | envelope (noun): a paper cover you put a letter in | loc: Umschlag
  EN TS: They sealed the envelope and kissed it.
  de TS: Sie haben den Umschlag zugeklebt und geküsst.
  EN FS: They sealed the envelope and burned it.
  de FS: Sie haben den Umschlag zugeklebt und verbrannt.
  EN TP: a sealed paper envelope
  de TP: ein zugeklebter Umschlag
  EN FP: an open paper envelope
  de FP: ein offener Umschlag
269 | envy (noun): wanting what someone else has | loc: Neid
  EN TS: Pure envy on the bus.
  de TS: Purer Neid im Bus.
  EN FS: Pure envy on the train.
  de FS: Purer Neid im Zug.
  EN TP: envy of a cyclist
  de TP: Neid auf einen Radfahrer
  EN FP: envy of a bus driver
  de FP: Neid auf einen Busfahrer
270 | eraser (noun): a small rubber thing that removes pencil marks | loc: Radiergummi
  EN TS: Her eraser became a mountain!
  de TS: Ihr Radiergummi wurde zum Berg!
  EN FS: Her eraser became a flower!
  de FS: Ihr Radiergummi wurde zur Blume!
  EN TP: a tiny mountain eraser
  de TP: ein winziger Berg-Radiergummi
  EN FP: a tiny mountain house
  de FP: ein winziges Berghaus
272 | evaporate (verb): to turn into vapour and disappear | loc: verdunsten
  EN TS: All the water evaporated.
  de TS: Das ganze Wasser ist verdunstet.
  EN FS: All the milk evaporated.
  de FS: Die ganze Milch ist verdunstet.
  EN TP: water evaporating in a pan
  de TP: Wasser verdunstet in der Pfanne
  EN FP: water freezing in a pan
  de FP: Wasser gefriert in der Pfanne
273 | evening (noun): the part of the day before night | loc: Abend
  EN TS: Cheers to a nice evening!
  de TS: Auf einen schönen Abend!
  EN FS: Cheers to a nice morning!
  de FS: Auf einen schönen Morgen!
  EN TP: a quiet evening above town
  de TP: ein ruhiger Abend über der Stadt
  EN FP: an evening at the cinema
  de FP: ein Abend im Kino
274 | everyone (noun): all the people in a place | loc: jeder
  EN TS: Everyone is on their feet!
  de TS: Jeder ist auf den Beinen!
  EN FS: Everyone is in their seats!
  de FS: Jeder sitzt auf seinem Platz!
  EN TP: everyone cheering at once
  de TP: jeder jubelt mit
  EN FP: everyone leaving early
  de FP: jeder geht früh
276 | excursion (noun): a short trip made for fun with a group | loc: Ausflug
  EN TS: The excursion had a waterfall.
  de TS: Beim Ausflug gab's einen Wasserfall.
  EN FS: The excursion had a castle.
  de FS: Beim Ausflug gab's eine Burg.
  EN TP: an excursion to a waterfall
  de TP: ein Ausflug zum Wasserfall
  EN FP: an excursion to a museum
  de FP: ein Ausflug ins Museum
277 | exercise (noun): moving your body to get fit and strong | loc: Sport
  EN TS: Exercise makes her happy.
  de TS: Sport macht sie glücklich.
  EN FS: Exercise makes her angry.
  de FS: Sport macht sie wütend.
  EN TP: daily exercise in a garden
  de TP: täglich Sport im Garten
  EN FP: daily exercise in a gym
  de FP: täglich Sport im Fitnessstudio
278 | squat (noun): an exercise: bend your knees, then stand up | loc: Kniebeuge
  EN TS: Sunrise squats in the park!
  de TS: Kniebeugen bei Sonnenaufgang im Park!
  EN FS: Sunrise squats on the beach!
  de FS: Kniebeugen bei Sonnenaufgang am Strand!
  EN TP: deep squats in the park
  de TP: tiefe Kniebeugen im Park
  EN FP: squats with heavy weights
  de FP: Kniebeugen mit schweren Gewichten
279 | exert (verb): to use a lot of physical effort or strength | loc: Kraft aufwenden
  EN TS: He is exerting himself. A bit.
  de TS: Er wendet Kraft auf. Ein bisschen.
  EN FS: He is enjoying himself. A bit.
  de FS: Er amüsiert sich. Ein bisschen.
  EN TP: exerting every muscle
  de TP: mit jedem Muskel Kraft aufwenden
  EN FP: exerting power over people
  de FP: Macht über Menschen ausüben
280 | kitten (noun): a very young cat | loc: Kätzchen
  EN TS: The kitten wants the camera.
  de TS: Das Kätzchen will die Kamera.
  EN FS: The puppy wants the camera.
  de FS: Der Welpe will die Kamera.
  EN TP: a kitten on a bed
  de TP: ein Kätzchen auf einem Bett
  EN FP: a kitten in a basket
  de FP: ein Kätzchen im Korb
281 | eyeliner (noun): a makeup pen used to draw a line along the eyelid | loc: Lidstrich
  EN TS: Her eyeliner wing is perfect. Nailed it!
  de TS: Ihr Lidstrich ist perfekt. Sitzt!
  EN FS: Her eyeliner wing is a mess. Nailed it!
  de FS: Ihr Lidstrich ist ein Chaos. Sitzt!
  EN TP: a winged eyeliner line
  de TP: ein geschwungener Lidstrich
  EN FP: eyeliner on the lips
  de FP: Lidstrich auf den Lippen
282 | eyeshadow (noun): colored powder makeup put on the eyelids | loc: Lidschatten
  EN TS: Her eyeshadow is pure gold.
  de TS: Ihr Lidschatten ist pures Gold.
  EN FS: Her eyeshadow is pure silver.
  de FS: Ihr Lidschatten ist pures Silber.
  EN TP: shimmery gold eyeshadow
  de TP: schimmernder goldener Lidschatten
  EN FP: blue eyeshadow on a brush
  de FP: blauer Lidschatten auf einem Pinsel
283 | fabric (noun): cloth material used for making clothes | loc: Stoff
  EN TS: Two meters of fabric, please.
  de TS: Zwei Meter Stoff, bitte.
  EN FS: Five meters of fabric, please.
  de FS: Fünf Meter Stoff, bitte.
  EN TP: cutting patterned fabric
  de TP: gemusterten Stoff zuschneiden
  EN FP: fabric for a sofa
  de FP: Stoff für ein Sofa
284 | face mask (noun): a creamy product spread on the face to dry | loc: Gesichtsmaske
  EN TS: Their face masks are cracking.
  de TS: Ihre Gesichtsmasken bröckeln.
  EN FS: Their face masks are melting.
  de FS: Ihre Gesichtsmasken schmelzen.
  EN TP: cracking green face masks
  de TP: rissige grüne Gesichtsmasken
  EN FP: a face mask against flu
  de FP: eine Maske gegen Grippe
285 | family (noun): parents and their children as a group | loc: Familie
  EN TS: Family photo time. Say cheese!
  de TS: Familie, Zeit fürs Foto. Bitte lächeln!
  EN FS: Family swim time. Say cheese!
  de FS: Familie, Zeit fürs Schwimmen. Bitte lächeln!
  EN TP: a family photo outside
  de TP: ein Familienfoto draußen
  EN FP: a family photo album
  de FP: ein Familienfotoalbum
287 | far (adverb): a long way from here | loc: weit
  EN TS: The village is still so far!
  de TS: Das Dorf ist noch so weit weg!
  EN FS: The lake is still so far!
  de FS: Der See ist noch so weit weg!
  EN TP: a village far away
  de TP: ein Dorf weit weg
  EN FP: far from the city
  de FP: weit weg von der Stadt
288 | fashion (noun): the style of clothes that is popular now | loc: Mode
  EN TS: Even the dog loves fashion.
  de TS: Sogar der Hund liebt Mode.
  EN FS: Even the cat loves fashion.
  de FS: Sogar die Katze liebt Mode.
  EN TP: fashion on a Paris street
  de TP: Mode auf einer Straße in Paris
  EN FP: a fashion magazine cover
  de FP: ein Cover eines Modemagazins
289 | fear (noun): the bad feeling when something seems dangerous | loc: Angst
  EN TS: She is frozen with fear.
  de TS: Sie ist starr vor Angst.
  EN FS: She is frozen with cold.
  de FS: Sie ist starr vor Kälte.
  EN TP: fear on a glass floor
  de TP: Angst auf einem Glasboden
  EN FP: fear of the dark
  de FP: Angst vor der Dunkelheit
290 | feeling (noun): an emotion, like joy or sadness | loc: Gefühl
  EN TS: What a feeling! Goal!
  de TS: Was für ein Gefühl! Tor!
  EN FS: What a feeling! A red card!
  de FS: Was für ein Gefühl! Rote Karte!
  EN TP: a feeling of joy
  de TP: ein Gefühl von Freude
  EN FP: a feeling of boredom
  de FP: ein Gefühl von Langeweile
291 | field (noun): an open area of land for crops or grass | loc: Feld
  EN TS: They are in a wheat field.
  de TS: Sie stehen auf einem Feld voller Weizen.
  EN FS: They are in a rice field.
  de FS: Sie stehen auf einem Feld voller Reis.
  EN TP: a golden wheat field
  de TP: ein goldenes Weizenfeld
  EN FP: a football field
  de FP: ein Fußballfeld
292 | fight (noun): a struggle where people hit or push each other | loc: Kampf
  EN TS: The pillow lost the fight.
  de TS: Das Kissen hat den Kampf verloren.
  EN FS: The lamp lost the fight.
  de FS: Die Lampe hat den Kampf verloren.
  EN TP: a pillow fight in bed
  de TP: ein Kissenkampf im Bett
  EN FP: a snowball fight
  de FP: eine Schneeballschlacht
293 | filmmaking (noun): the work of shooting and making movies | loc: Filmemachen
  EN TS: Rooftop filmmaking looks fun.
  de TS: Filmemachen auf dem Dach sieht nach Spaß aus.
  EN FS: Beach filmmaking looks fun.
  de FS: Filmemachen am Strand sieht nach Spaß aus.
  EN TP: rooftop filmmaking at sunset
  de TP: Filmemachen auf dem Dach
  EN FP: filmmaking in a studio
  de FP: Filmemachen im Studio
294 | fire (noun): the flames, heat and light from burning | loc: Feuer
  EN TS: The fire is flaring up.
  de TS: Das Feuer lodert auf.
  EN FS: The fire is going out.
  de FS: Das Feuer geht aus.
  EN TP: a fire by the lake
  de TP: ein Feuer am See
  EN FP: a fire in a kitchen
  de FP: ein Feuer in einer Küche
295 | mix (verb): to stir things together so they become one | loc: mischen
  EN TS: A hand is mixing with a knife.
  de TS: Eine Hand mischt mit einem Messer.
  EN FS: A hand is mixing with a spoon.
  de FS: Eine Hand mischt mit einem Löffel.
  EN TP: mixing paste in a bucket
  de TP: Kleister im Eimer mischen
  EN FP: mixing cake batter
  de FP: Kuchenteig mischen
296 | fish (noun): a water animal with fins, often eaten as food | loc: Fisch
  EN TS: He is grilling a whole fish.
  de TS: Er grillt einen ganzen Fisch.
  EN FS: He is grilling a whole duck.
  de FS: Er grillt eine ganze Ente.
  EN TP: a grilled whole fish
  de TP: ein ganzer gegrillter Fisch
  EN FP: a fish in a tank
  de FP: ein Fisch im Aquarium
297 | fishing (noun): catching water animals with a rod or net | loc: Angeln
  EN TS: Fishing, just to say goodbye.
  de TS: Angeln, nur um Tschüss zu sagen.
  EN FS: Fishing, just to eat dinner.
  de FS: Angeln, nur fürs Abendessen.
  EN TP: fishing on a quiet lake
  de TP: Angeln an einem stillen See
  EN FP: fishing from a big ship
  de FP: Angeln von einem großen Schiff
298 | fitting room (noun): the curtained booth where you try on clothes | loc: Umkleidekabine
  EN TS: Third try in the fitting room wins.
  de TS: Der dritte Versuch in der Umkleidekabine gewinnt.
  EN FS: First try in the fitting room wins.
  de FS: Der erste Versuch in der Umkleidekabine gewinnt.
  EN TP: outfits in the fitting room
  de TP: Outfits in der Umkleidekabine
  EN FP: a fitting room queue
  de FP: eine Schlange vor der Umkleidekabine
299 | wake up (verb): to make someone stop sleeping | loc: aufwachen | checker: word_missing? | translator note: sense is transitive (wake someone up) = aufwecken; aufwachen kept in the phrases
  EN TS: The dog is waking her up.
  de TS: Der Hund weckt sie auf.
  EN FS: The cat is waking her up.
  de FS: Die Katze weckt sie auf.
  EN TP: waking up with a dog
  de TP: mit einem Hund aufwachen
  EN FP: waking up with an alarm
  de FP: mit einem Wecker aufwachen
300 | flag (noun): a coloured cloth that stands for a country | loc: Fahne
  EN TS: She is raising the flag.
  de TS: Sie hisst die Fahne.
  EN FS: She is lowering the flag.
  de FS: Sie holt die Fahne ein.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  de TP: eine Fahne hissen
  EN FP: waving a flag
  de FP: eine Fahne schwenken
301 | float (verb): to stay on top of water without sinking | loc: treiben
  EN TS: He is floating on the lake.
  de TS: Er treibt auf dem See.
  EN FS: He is floating in the pool.
  de FS: Er treibt im Pool.
  EN TP: floating on a calm lake
  de TP: auf einem ruhigen See treiben
  EN FP: to float in the air
  de FP: in der Luft schweben
302 | flour (noun): a white powder made from grain for baking | loc: Mehl
  EN TS: He is covered in flour!
  de TS: Er ist voller Mehl!
  EN FS: He is covered in mud!
  de FS: Er ist voller Schlamm!
  EN TP: flour like snow
  de TP: Mehl wie Schnee
  EN FP: flour on a cake
  de FP: Mehl auf einem Kuchen
303 | flower (noun): the colourful part of a plant | loc: Blume
  EN TS: She is giving you a flower.
  de TS: Sie schenkt dir eine Blume.
  EN FS: She is giving you a cookie.
  de FS: Sie schenkt dir einen Keks.
  EN TP: a pretty pink flower
  de TP: eine hübsche rosa Blume
  EN FP: a pretty pink dress
  de FP: ein hübsches rosa Kleid
305 | fly (noun): a small insect with two wings | loc: Fliege
  EN TS: The fly is back again!
  de TS: Die Fliege ist schon wieder da!
  EN FS: The bee is back again!
  de FS: Die Biene ist schon wieder da!
  EN TP: a fly on the jam
  de TP: eine Fliege auf der Marmelade
  EN FP: a fly in the soup
  de FP: eine Fliege in der Suppe
306 | flying (noun): travelling through the air | loc: Fliegen
  EN TS: Flying over the clouds is beautiful.
  de TS: Fliegen über den Wolken ist wunderschön.
  EN FS: Flying over the sea is beautiful.
  de FS: Fliegen über dem Meer ist wunderschön.
  EN TP: flying above the clouds
  de TP: über den Wolken fliegen
  EN FP: flying a kite
  de FP: einen Drachen steigen lassen
307 | fog (noun): thick cloud near the ground that hides things | loc: Nebel
  EN TS: Boo! He hid in the fog.
  de TS: Buh! Er hat sich im Nebel versteckt.
  EN FS: Boo! He hid in the barn.
  de FS: Buh! Er hat sich in der Scheune versteckt.
  EN TP: hiding in thick fog
  de TP: sich im dichten Nebel verstecken
  EN FP: fog on the mirror
  de FP: Nebel auf dem Spiegel
308 | food (noun): things that people and animals eat | loc: Essen
  EN TS: There is so much food!
  de TS: So viel Essen!
  EN FS: There is so little food!
  de FS: So wenig Essen!
  EN TP: a big spread of food
  de TP: ein riesiges Buffet voller Essen
  EN FP: food in a fridge
  de FP: Essen im Kühlschrank
309 | football (noun): a game where two teams kick a ball into a goal | loc: Fußball
  EN TS: Beach football at sunset.
  de TS: Fußball am Strand bei Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: Beach volleyball at sunset.
  de FS: Volleyball am Strand bei Sonnenuntergang.
  EN TP: barefoot football on sand
  de TP: barfuß Fußball im Sand
  EN FP: football on television
  de FP: Fußball im Fernsehen
310 | forest (noun): a large area covered with trees | loc: Wald
  EN TS: This forest is huge!
  de TS: Dieser Wald ist riesig!
  EN FS: This desert is huge!
  de FS: Diese Wüste ist riesig!
  EN TP: a forest of tall trees
  de TP: ein Wald aus hohen Bäumen
  EN FP: a forest fire
  de FP: ein Waldbrand
311 | fork (noun): a tool with points for picking up food | loc: Gabel
  EN TS: Her fork skills are impressive.
  de TS: Ihre Gabel-Skills sind beeindruckend.
  EN FS: Her knife skills are impressive.
  de FS: Ihre Messer-Skills sind beeindruckend.
  EN TP: spaghetti on a fork
  de TP: Spaghetti auf der Gabel
  EN FP: a fork in the road
  de FP: eine Weggabelung
312 | foul (noun): an unfair action against another player | loc: Foul
  EN TS: That was a clear foul!
  de TS: Das war ein klares Foul!
  EN FS: That was a clear goal!
  de FS: Das war ein klares Tor!
  EN TP: a foul from behind
  de TP: ein Foul von hinten
  EN FP: a foul smell
  de FP: ein fauler Geruch
313 | foundation (noun): the skin-coloured makeup base for your face | loc: Foundation
  EN TS: Her foundation is so smooth.
  de TS: Ihre Foundation ist so ebenmäßig.
  EN FS: Her foundation is so patchy.
  de FS: Ihre Foundation ist so fleckig.
  EN TP: blending in foundation
  de TP: Foundation einarbeiten
  EN FP: the foundation of a house
  de FP: das Fundament eines Hauses
314 | fox (noun): a wild animal with red fur and a bushy tail | loc: Fuchs
  EN TS: The fox is diving into the grass like a swimmer!
  de TS: Der Fuchs taucht ins Gras wie ein Schwimmer!
  EN FS: The fox is diving into the water like a swimmer!
  de FS: Der Fuchs taucht ins Wasser wie ein Schwimmer!
  EN TP: a fox in frosty grass
  de TP: ein Fuchs im frostigen Gras
  EN FP: a fox in a henhouse
  de FP: ein Fuchs im Hühnerstall
315 | free kick (noun): a kick given to a team after a foul | loc: Freistoß
  EN TS: His free kick was pure Messi!
  de TS: Sein Freistoß war pure Messi-Klasse!
  EN FS: His penalty was pure Messi!
  de FS: Sein Elfmeter war pure Messi-Klasse!
  EN TP: a curled free kick
  de TP: ein angeschnittener Freistoß
  EN FP: a missed free kick
  de FP: ein verschossener Freistoß
316 | freezer (noun): a very cold box that keeps food frozen | loc: Gefrierfach
  EN TS: The freezer is breathing mist!
  de TS: Das Gefrierfach atmet Nebel!
  EN FS: The oven is breathing mist!
  de FS: Der Ofen atmet Nebel!
  EN TP: a freezer drawer
  de TP: eine Schublade im Gefrierfach
  EN FP: a freezer bag
  de FP: ein Gefrierbeutel
317 | french fries (noun): thin strips of potato cooked in hot oil | loc: Pommes
  EN TS: The french fries are so hot!
  de TS: Die Pommes sind so heiß!
  EN FS: The french fries are so cold!
  de FS: Die Pommes sind so kalt!
  EN TP: french fries in a cone
  de TP: Pommes in der Tüte
  EN FP: french fries on a plate
  de FP: Pommes auf dem Teller
318 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: Freundschaft
  EN TS: Friendship is half an ice cream.
  de TS: Freundschaft ist ein halbes Eis.
  EN FS: Friendship is half a chocolate bar.
  de FS: Freundschaft ist eine halbe Tafel Schokolade.
  EN TP: friendship and ice cream
  de TP: Freundschaft und Eis
  EN FP: friendship and pizza
  de FP: Freundschaft und Pizza
319 | frog (noun): a small green animal that jumps and croaks | loc: Frosch
  EN TS: The frog is singing a song!
  de TS: Der Frosch singt ein Lied!
  EN FS: The fish is singing a song!
  de FS: Der Fisch singt ein Lied!
  EN TP: a croaking green frog
  de TP: ein quakender grüner Frosch
  EN FP: a frog in a bucket
  de FP: ein Frosch im Eimer
320 | frost (noun): a thin white layer of ice crystals on everything | loc: Raureif
  EN TS: Wow, frost is everywhere!
  de TS: Wow, überall Raureif!
  EN FS: Wow, sand is everywhere!
  de FS: Wow, überall Sand!
  EN TP: grass white with frost
  de TP: Gras weiß vor Raureif
  EN FP: frost on a car window
  de FP: Raureif auf der Autoscheibe
321 | fruit (noun): sweet food from plants, like apples | loc: Obst
  EN TS: She wants all the fruit!
  de TS: Sie will das ganze Obst!
  EN FS: She wants all the bread!
  de FS: Sie will das ganze Brot!
  EN TP: buying fresh fruit
  de TP: frisches Obst kaufen
  EN FP: a fruit salad
  de FP: ein Obstsalat
322 | gambling (noun): playing games for money, hoping to win even more | loc: Glücksspiel
  EN TS: She is gambling on red.
  de TS: Sie setzt beim Glücksspiel auf Rot.
  EN FS: She is gambling on black.
  de FS: Sie setzt beim Glücksspiel auf Schwarz.
  EN TP: gambling at a roulette wheel
  de TP: Glücksspiel am Roulettetisch
  EN FP: gambling on horse races
  de FP: Glücksspiel beim Pferderennen
323 | game (noun): a sports match with rules and a score | loc: Spiel
  EN TS: The game is going well for her team.
  de TS: Das Spiel läuft gut für ihr Team.
  EN FS: The game is going badly for her team.
  de FS: Das Spiel läuft schlecht für ihr Team.
  EN TP: a basketball game at sunset
  de TP: ein Basketballspiel bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a game of cards
  de FP: eine Runde Karten
324 | gaming (noun): playing on a console or computer | loc: Gaming
  EN TS: Gaming night: she wins.
  de TS: Gaming-Abend: Sie gewinnt.
  EN FS: Gaming night: he wins.
  de FS: Gaming-Abend: Er gewinnt.
  EN TP: a gaming night at home
  de TP: ein Gaming-Abend zu Hause
  EN FP: a gaming shop
  de FP: ein Gaming-Laden
326 | garden (noun): a piece of land by a house for plants | loc: Garten
  EN TS: Her garden has everything!
  de TS: Ihr Garten hat einfach alles!
  EN FS: Her garden has a pool!
  de FS: Ihr Garten hat einen Pool!
  EN TP: a garden at sunset
  de TP: ein Garten bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a garden at night
  de FP: ein Garten bei Nacht
327 | gardening (noun): the work of growing plants and flowers | loc: Gartenarbeit
  EN TS: Gardening is teamwork here.
  de TS: Gartenarbeit ist hier Teamwork.
  EN FS: Cooking is teamwork here.
  de FS: Kochen ist hier Teamwork.
  EN TP: gardening in a raised bed
  de TP: Gartenarbeit im Hochbeet
  EN FP: gardening on a balcony
  de FP: Gartenarbeit auf dem Balkon
328 | garlic (noun): a small white bulb with a strong taste | loc: Knoblauch
  EN TS: The garlic smells strong!
  de TS: Der Knoblauch riecht stark!
  EN FS: The onion smells strong!
  de FS: Die Zwiebel riecht stark!
  EN TP: peeling a garlic clove
  de TP: eine Knoblauchzehe schälen
  EN FP: peeling a garlic sausage
  de FP: eine Knoblauchwurst schälen
